Sorry I meant to say not the full max, maybe 5yr around 200mil, that way you can protect last year
I have no idea what to believe anymore. This imo is a really good theory with some good evidence. What I just cannot get over then is how Foxy bro has just disappeared. I understand we don't know who the mother is in the Afton family so it isn't crazy that a family member is unaccounted for, but Foxy bro was actually present at one point. Where is he now then if his supposedly younger brother is older and his Dad is just absent from his life since he is busy being dead and haunting people. I also am thrown by A) Foxy bro watching TV and Mike watching TV in SL (yes, anybody can watch TV, but this just doesnt feel coincidental to me) and B) UCN does seem to hint heavily at a brother rivalry with the Freddy/Foxy anime and one kid (BV?) haunting the player.
Holy hell good shit mane
Fucking cess pool, that subreddit. Didn't MDE's Youtube channel get banned? Good riddance.
Quem é esse cara?
Those should be fine. I cruise around the street pretty easy with my 52mm 99 duro classic shape.
well kissanime has been down in the bucket from al of those adds start flooding my pc so yea ill just stuick with what my friends gave me
He was great in second half, but was alright in first half. Nothing amazing
Can you explain what a Cal grant is? Is it a scholarship?
Am I missing a million things or just 999,999 things? Specifically I’ll just start with- fucking what?!
Because socialism is a disease.
It should be?
Hmm, true, I am mainly just thinking of his good acts, or what he thought were good acts, but he does have his bad moments or those moments he goes too far or his filter doesn't work. I guess I would have no choice but to call him a narcissist now, after looking up the definition and symptoms, as I thought it just meant you have a lot of love and admiration for yourself, not that you desire everyone to love you. Michael is a textbook narcissist in that case, and is ultimately a broken, unstable man who has a lot of mental issues.
Overrated: Pine Barrens. It's one of the funniest, but in hindsight, it turned out pretty pointless, considering it was so isolated, with no impact or relation to the remainder of the show.  Underrated: Commendatori. I really liked that episode and I think it was very meaningful, while everyone else took it to be your typical holiday episode.
Steve really connecting with this group of Swaggy, Scottie and Bayleigh. This has been a pretty interesting conversation 
Lol you can't just say something like this without providing a source
It's not an opinion. It's a fact. It lowers property values, so they can only put it in low property value areas.  Back to my previous point about segregation being pretty natural, don't you think it's weird that the government put all the Eastern Europeans on Polish Hill and then named it Polish Hill? And put all the Jews in Squirrel Hill? And made all the affluent Chinese buy up the East side?Why didn't they just figure out the exact breakdown of all the races and make sure that every street had an even representation of all the races?  It's foolish on its face to pretend that Pittsburgh is racist because it doesn't look like a Benetton ad. It's just virtue signaling to talk about how all the races should come live together when so many have obviously chosen to live in specific areas and there is no way to actually make them all mingle.
How is your guys communication? Like, are you guys both happy with the arrangement you have now? Could he be wanting more? 
I can relate. Is the art book and statue cool though?
Thanks for your input. 
Still the same GrandpaNippers 
Crosspost away if you believe my poptart is untrustworthy.
People forget, Glenny invited Mo Vaughn while telling Frankie he couldn't have a plus one.
Every downvote for them is a "feel-good" point. 
I knew at some point this place would turn on AJ as a national broadcaster but I didn't think it'd happen this suddenly
Luckily.   As far as fixing legacy figures goes. I could easily break Saba's head off.   It'll be way easier than gold painting my butterscotch ranger was. 
Yeah, if you actually think they had better chances so you really do not understand this game
Now, I'm even more bummed. I screwed up the front nine of opening so badly, recovered the back nine (-12) for a -19 overall and missed qualifying in 52nd place. Got a -13 in qualifying too. Thought I had the course figured other than that front nine.
A. Not telling your children about your fuck ups for fear they will fuck up like you -leads to them walking in your exact footsteps of fuck ups  B. Imposing religion heavily on them in a diverse social situation -leads to them rebelling against you and feeling guilt for not believing the way you do C. Giving the child what they want always- leads to entitlement.  
Is it : "The Hot Dog Band," the "Hot Dog Band," "The Hot Dog" band, or the "Hot Dog" band?
Clamps look good on you, especially with the chain in your mouth, and with it wide open. 
Are. You. Ready? 
ALL PATRIOTS WELCOME !! WWG1WGA. FIGHT,FIGHT,FIGHT.
I feel bad for them 
What’s the fucking excuse for this asshole now? 
Yeah but OP was talking in a different context
Well considering I have a large scar around my penis, it's pretty insensitive (which in turn makes it hard to cum during sex and maintain an erection) and often chafes when having sex or masturbating, I'd say it's not a false reality. I think you need to stop and consider that others don't experience what you've  experienced and that you coul be experiencing confirmation bias in real life from conversations with other people  because people who generally have this issue don't particularly like to talk about it in real life (can you imagine why or do I need to explain that too?). But based on your argument with the other poster, I can see that you're not willing to consider that.  You don't have to feel mutilated. But you also don't get to dictate how others feel about their own bodies.
Lol that’s hilarious, rekt
This is the intellectual Florida man
**Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.**   ___  ### Frequently Posted Topics  Please [use the search](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortniteBR/search?q=&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=relevance&amp;t=all) before posting about something. Topics that become excessive and or redundant due to being posted with an abnormal frequency are subject to removal. “Breaking news” style topics are included in this. We will only allow one thread per topic, with Epic and Moderator threads taking priority.  * Feel free to view our [Epic Plz Wiki here](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortniteBR/wiki/epicplz), it will be updated whenever the community begins to overwhelmingly express one similar concerns about one topic. If there is no meaningful developments into said topics, threads can and will be removed under this rule.  * When something big hits, it’s not uncommon to see dozens of posts on the same topic fill the front page at the same time. Unfortunately, this means that content creators or community contributors don’t get to share submissions they have spent time on. As a result, duplicate posts, or similar posts around the same topic will be removed - with the first submitted allowed. However, official posts made by Epic or the Mod team take priority, and removals of these duplicate threads will be made at a moderator's discretion.  ___  [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
Why?  That is a lot of content being released.  Did you not read the bottom of the roadmap?
I think the reason they havent shown Blackout is because they're not to ready to show it because its a very recent thing 
The title on theguardian website reads "m16". At first I was thinking that I am missing something.
no u
/r/funny not cursed
See Rule 1. 
&gt; Krait have shitty jump ranges Got mine to like.. 19. Is that bad?
r/slimegirls
Except the kangaroo ending
i died when he said "I use the word faggot to call people retards." i understand in a weird way
&gt;Very few people follow the speed limit,  May or may not be against the law, depending on if you live in a presumed speed limit state or an absolute speed limit state   &gt; just about everybody drives through yellow lights   Not illegal. Yellow light is just a warning that red is coming.   &gt;and red lights, very few people come to complete stops at stop signs,  Bullshit. Most drivers do not run red lights nor do they run stop signs. 
Not true at all, one big rock had 450 health and give almost as much brick as a large tree.
Stroking one out tonight. Will cock pretty much anyone. Will cum on the right girl. Pm me your kik 
Looks like some sort of holy symbol for a kitten cult 
Is it working now?
I'm curious about this as well. 
If he keeps playing like this he won't be in the next world cup..
Half naked girls get 1000s of up votes, how many can we get for our boy in blue? 
yeah it really sucks on blood lodge and vs freddy.
This degeneracy needs to end
Fair enough, I can see that reasoning. The only times I'd disagree is if everytime C1 says something C2 automatically disregards it no matter what is said or if C2 didn't provide proof when asked as well. That or if one side is just using ad hominem attacks, that is an automatic loss in my book.
*sahf
The game would be too slow
Mine has got to be Akihiko from P4AU, which I mained. Think about it, he's not that reliant on his Persona, which makes him easy to convert to BBTAG. His All out Attack (which is basically this game's D button) has him leap a little bit unlike some the other Persona characters. He's almost a perfect fit for a port to this game. His only problem is his 236/214 Cs and Ds. And his A smart combo having the enemy leap in the air. Maybe should revert the combo back to the P4A, maybe.
Like a fucking douche nozzle they do! 
yea he was coming that's for sure lawl
You guys got any fucks?   No fucks, zero, nada, nyet. No fucks here left to give. Maybe if you European faggots didn't partition them up against thier will, multiple times, they just might be more open minded about foreigners.   Good for Poland, they have had a shitty history with invaders.
What I’m saying is he can’t control that power. He can’t contain it. He’d lose to both of them if he doesn’t use at least 15-30% consistently and confidently without injuries. That’s why he should be lower than them 
That's the correct pronunciation. YouTubers often do one that I mentioned however.
In a coma 🙃
It's a surfefire way to get some answers. : D
Casemiro better than coutinho?? 
That one Miramar one with like 10 conditions made me double take when I saw it at first, no chance in hell I'm getting that
&gt; and tanks want earrings.  Did you mean Rings?
Thanks for the response. Gonna have to read the whole ln just for this.
a hombrew'd wiiu only looks in a /wiiu/ folder so it should be fine to have stuff on at the same time
You do understand that if you do not eat meat, you need to supply those nutrients with plants correct?  Different kinds of cereals and grasses can be stored long term. They themselves do not contain all of the nutrients necessary for a healthy diet. However, when fed to an animal the animal synthethizes the amino acids into the necessary nutrients.  A human in winter has two options, to eat the plants that provide the nutrients they need (which requires international importation of fruits and vegetables form other nations) or to eat locally produced chicken.   You need to understand that not all plants are equivalent. See for example this article by scientific american: https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/lettuce-produces-more-greenhouse-gas-emissions-than-bacon-does/  Some of the plants that HUMANS eat are more resource intensive than the plants that ANIMALS eat. So the net efficiency is higher for certain foods. Which is why locally produced goods consistently use less resources than imported goods, regardless of whether they are meats or not.  I understand that you're skeptical fo what I am saying but try to picture the entire situation. Any product that has to fly over seas will produce more C)2 than anything that was 100% locally produced. So bananas are more CO2 polluting than say, a wild caught salmon using artisanal fishing.
I'm a Redditor because I don't spell Docter or DESTRUCTER 1000
P
Thanks man but I just got a better offer for my turtle white. You think you could add? 
Did you even watch the video? He said that we have **people** coming in. These people are clearly referring to MS 13 and their Ilk And yes. If these types of people are coming in or messing around the border and ICE agents can't process them, there is clearly a problem. Who's the lemming now? 
Best mtv unplugged ever.  Love AIC
Yeah, $5K will get you 10 m5.large instances for 1 year, or 5 m5.large instances for 3 years.   If you don't need the compute power for anything else, use them to mine cryptocurrency. You can also sell the reserved instances in the marketplace to get the credits out as cash, but it might be more hassle than it's worth for a handful of instances.
Reddit does not have hashtags.
Ahh, you mean a trap bf? Sadly I don't have one either, and I haven't seen a cute trap irl yet.
You couldn’t be more Aron’s buddy. And Se has nothing to do with if you can see or not. And I met some INTPs who didn’t know it was winter they thought it was summer when it was winter because they were not watching around them 😂.  I don’t have much fi at all but I don’t like ENTPs wit Fi because they don’t exist. So they’re fake. Must be typed better. And the pizza thing has nothing to do with anything 
Who shit in your corn flakes?  *waaatteeeerr*
Upvoted for  "Windhorst has been stalking LeBron for about 55 years now."
I see that your on PS4 and I played a game today where 3 of us were kicked because of an “error”. We were all kicked different rounds... we still won the game tho
You have been banned from participating in r/nba. You can still view and subscribe to r/nba, but you won't be able to post or comment.    ────────    If you have a question regarding your ban, you can contact the moderator team for r/nba by replying to this message.    Reminder from the Reddit staff: If you use another account to circumvent this subreddit ban, that will be considered a violation of the Content Policy and can result in your account being suspended from the site as a whole.
Well it's a nice pic. RIP Mods 
They're psionic and they have tomb world preference, and you can invade them before they become an empire. The problem is, as expressed in this topic, they seem to have a tendency to bug out and never form an empire.
Hi there! Your post was removed because it uses the text box. Per [rule 1](/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-), use of the text box is prohibited. You can resubmit your post without the textbox.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
To completion? 
&gt; Ce plm mai fac cretinii astia de la guvernare? Ce o sa fie de data asta? Teroristi? Teroristii platiti de Soros? Dati-va in plm de cretini cu planurile voastre inapoiate cu tot, ca o sa ajungeti ca Ceasca, impuscati in cap.  What?!? 
Its a *command* ability.
Ahhh bling storm, I follow you’re work on the DSLR thread
Nope.  Never.  Players are superstitious and would think that wearing 13 would send them into a horrible slump to start the season.
While I love YOI to death, I’m generally more into stuff with femslash and yuri undertones than shonen ai, so these may not be quite up your alley if that’s not your jam, I dunno. If you enjoyed the competition aspects of YOI, Hibike Euphonium is an excellent drama about a high school concert band striving for national competition.  Hibike’s animation is fantastic as well, and the show does an excellent job with establishing atmosphere.  Love Live is a guilty pleasure of mine too.  Lots of humor and drama, as well as an overall plot line about winning a singing competition—both the original and Sunshine are fun, feel-good shows.  You can debate over the queerbaitiness of both, but there’s none of that non-con or incesty gross shit that’s oh so prevalent in the yuri genre, and both have a sizeable queer female fan base, so take that as you will as far as quality goes I guess?  I love both to death though regardless.  If what you’re wanting is drama with a well-written same-sex romance, give Aoi Hana or Izetta the Last Witch a try.  The first is a high-school slice of life that actually gives a relatable, realistic take on its romances.  Izetta is alternate history WWII tale with witches and magic. The relationship between the two main girls reminds me a lot of how Victor and Yuri’s was handled.  You mentioned in another comment that you liked FMA, so you might enjoy this one as well.
Skyhook followed by dream shake. Distance third is probably the UTEP two-step?
Trump did it, that's their problem
This is the kind of response being mildly but not really left will get you.   I think if they meet an actual Communist they might literally cease to exist
Explain how this is satire and not just a terrible attempt at comedy. 
Substitute plates actually. 
1mg  In short, it was about a 15hr trip highlighted by a 5-6 hour period of continuously dying and being reborn in a rhythmic cycle.   Every iteration of the cycle went like this:  First I was blasted out of my consciousness and identified with the entire cosmos, then the Galaxy, then the solar system, then all life on Earth, then all the people who have and will ever lived, then all people now, then all my family, and then all versions of myself, past, present, and future, and then back into my ego. Then it started over again.
Well I'm guaranteed to be in the screenshot so ligma
R
Douchebag: YOU FAILED!  Me: So did your dad's condom!
Are they supposed to distract me from the front end damage?
&gt; You mean besides that it conflates "race" for "need"?   Except it doesn't. It simply assigns a tangible, equivalent value to all ethnic backgrounds.  &gt;A white male from an impoverished family who's never had a member even graduate high school before him is undoubtedly more needy than someone like Sasha Obama.  Need has nothing to do with it. White males from impoverished families are a dime a dozen in colleges throughout the US. Their ethnic background is not as valuable because there are already so many of them applying and being accepted.  &gt;But you aren't arguing for it to be need based, you're arguing it to be color based.  I'm arguing that ethnic experiences are a tangible asset that institutions wish to acquire.
r/legaladvice 
If you listen closely, you can hear someone responding to them as Luke walks in. ☺️
In Gotham, when Jeremiah (Joker) burns an entire room full of people who are alive. You watch as they repeadtly slam on the only exit and he looks in just staring with this proud-like look. There is some stuff on that show that really makes me question how it possibly airs on FOX.
No. Just the most recent story stage. 
The funniest part is that most marie viewers/stream-snipers end up this autistic, but every time this happens every other marie viewer never quite seems to realize they're just looking into a mirror.
Never 2500 at once, but at least a couple times I’ve died with 1200+ geo down the drain. When those times have happened, I’ve been like “fuck it, I’m done with this game.”  Then I keep going and playing for hours on end!
Peace and purpose.. you got it all &lt;3
Sonny Gray is horrible. 
 I love the enthusiasm, but you've already got an account!
FREEMAN MVP
Pineda actually had the ability to pitch at home. Gray can’t.
So wait, lynching is still legal? A legal way to kill people? 
There should be an option to wear more heat friendly uniforms if the temp gets above 90.
Louisiana Tech has submitted their number. UAB you're up. You have until [07/01 08:00 EST](https://www.timeanddate.com/countdown/afootball?p0=0&amp;msg=Playclock&amp;iso=20180702T000002).  It's 1st and 10 on the UAB 48.  /u/sammystinger reply with **run** or **pass** and your number. [Play list](https://www.reddit.com/r/FakeCollegeFootball/wiki/refbot) [](#datatag{"thread":%20"8tinjh",%20"action":%20{"__enum__":%20"Action.PLAY"}})
Just wait!!!!! He's ours
he ain't the 2nd but he was strong
[at least this d-bag is out of baseball](https://twitter.com/gehrig38/status/1012855709632008192)
Yeah, that one was easily the worst. I like how apparently the only two options are forgiveness or revenge. It's like in this persons mind not forgiving = wanting Monika to eternally suffer.
I'm curious to see where this statistic comes from. I seriously doubt he actually has a 30-40% approval rating. Where was this demographic collected? How many of them were from each party? Was there random sampling? 
I don't understand how your company was even using fair here. The only way I can read this is that "its fair we pay him more because he's a man and it would be wrong to put him on the same level as a woman". Is that it?
/r/sadcringe
Your submission `Scenes from the protest in DC today.` was automatically removed because `youtu.be` is not on our approved source [whitelist](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/whitelist). r/politics has a number of conditions that domains must adhere to in order to be approved as an acceptable source. Domains must:  * Be notable, as defined by our [**domain notability guidelines**](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/whitelist). Notable domains will consist of news organizations, research organizations, political advocacy groups, governmental agencies / bodies, and political parties.  * Contain articles, videos or sound-clips relevant to current US politics * Contain original content that has not been stolen or rehosted from another source.  * Be accessible at least once **without** paying for a subscription or completing a survey.   If you believe that you have a domain that is eligible for our approved whitelist, please use the link at the end of this message to submit it to us. However please note that if you submit spam or rule breaking content to us via the form, we will match the domain against this submission and may take action against your account. If you submit a spam domain via the form, your account may be reported to the site administrators. To submit a domain for approval [use this form](https://goo.gl/forms/lRQikA1rI0bVbKCl1) and follow the instructions provided   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/politics) if you have any questions or concerns.*
 I captained him out of peer pressure and going with the crowd. I was warned about peer pressure ...
I got the idea that all MCU TV series and movies are connected, but Legion is not. Could it be in the same universe? I've been watching it as something completely on "it's own".
Well to be fair it was awful because it trapped all of its players in a two year virtual coma 
Welcome to Normal Nudes! This subreddit is a body gallery first and foremost, and **is not a place for unsolicited health advice, sexual come-ons, body shaming, or any other incivility. Violations of these rules can result in a permanent ban.** If you see comments in violation of these rules, please report them. For this submission: If this submission looks sexual in nature, features an erection, or lacks the submitters age, height, and weight, it will be removed. **If you are OP and you now see your post does not fit our requirements, please delete your submission and resubmit per our rules.** For others, please report the submission.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/normalnudes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
It was a while ago actually
"Please consult your doctor if you f5 for 4 consecutive hours"
They do if you are citing a statistic as "x% of the US", rather than "x% of voters", which is still less than 50%.
haha yeah, same. 
God damn I wish there were hazards like this in older MH games for those fuckheads that decided to stay at camp or go AFK during fucking Dalamadur hunts.. Swole snake has a lot of HP for four, especially when one carts twice because they have literal shit for armor and decide they don't want to help, and one just goes AFK..
You look great.
I need three of the rainbows, the SR Mewtwo, shining rayquaza, and for some reason, Palkia and Zekrom. I've pulled 3-4 of everything besides those two and it's really frustrating sometimes.  I'm so mixed on rainbows. There's some Pokemon who look really good as them and some that are really horrible. If they did do them it should have just been like the flagship Pokemon of each set (i.e Solgaleo and Lunala for sm base, or the necrozmas for Ultra Prism). Making everything have three versions (or more) is so unnecessary. Making the full arts kinda just monotone doesn't help them either. I'm gonna end up trying to get complete sets but way way after I get done with other eras like BW and XY. I don't play the competitive game at all so I have no real reason to invest in Sun and Moon cards.
Everyone taking the trolls bait lol
Every time I see these I thank god that Oregon didn't choke as a #1 seed in the R64 a few years back (not that it was likely I just assume the worst scenerios will happen to my teams), my worst nightmare was exactly what is happening with Virginia haha 
Try using Tinder or something else maybe? Grindr isn't exactly the perfect app if you want to date.
my problem is I cant acceses old email and jagex thinks the accounts not mine
Instead of Open and Apartments, we say Trump and commieblock
I’m confused about that grating in the floor.
Good on you, man.
[75954-1: Hogwarts Great Hall](https://brickset.com/sets/75954-1) [[Photo]](https://images.brickset.com/sets/images/75954-1.jpg) [75953-1: Hogwarts Whomping Willow](https://brickset.com/sets/75953-1) [[Photo]](https://images.brickset.com/sets/images/75953-1.jpg) [75951-1: Grindelwald's Escape](https://brickset.com/sets/75951-1) [[Photo]](https://images.brickset.com/sets/images/75951-1.jpg) 
Nice thanks! I've legit never watched on TV, only spent hours and hours on yt...lol
I wonder if she's tried anal?
Super hot! Wish there was more content like this.
From a story telling perspective maybe, but I don’t think socialism is necessarily great in all aspect.
So you would be ok with it if the person (hypothetically) knew that the the sex worker was willing and did it consensually?
ah yes, meant for D5
Thank you for educating this dumb country fish. 
Blac Rabbit are fucking incredible and I've slept on them far too long and they've only released one EP and it was in 2017.  Tame Impala vibes from Brooklyn. You're all welcome.
There are border laws meant to watch out for infectious disease.  There are border laws looking out for the spread of harmful critters fuckin' up our ecosystem.  Laws looking out against contraband.  Laws respecting our system of taxation.  Against wanted criminals.  Then... then there are laws enforced to keep away and dissuade people of color from coming here and integrating into our society.  Guess what part of all that Trump, Sessions, Bannon and Gorka care about most.
Haha I appreciate some good old fashioned sticking it to the man as much as the next guy (I guess I'm "the man" in this situation?). Cheers brother!
Its possible, sad to say.
That’s fair [6]
Yeah
Felicity hands him a putter, "This should be simple."  She furrows her brow, "But... I do not mind working at all. The guests shouldn't worry about me because I am fine. Can they not understand that?"
So mine might be a little different. My teams manage 7 titles from desktop software to 3 big saas apps. We design and build super secure huge   edrm's and document collaboration.   Pm's manage the teams and set the product roadmaps and bring features forward and write a ton into our wiki and releases. They manage the how and we do the what.  We set global design patterns and review and sign off all designs, we also knock back less than stellar ux for rework. We have a really good healthy tension between PM and design, where they need to debate thd feature with us, before we even start.   Edit: We designed a visual and ux language. We mock and test each component, then build libraries, each library of components is shared and used. Combinations of components and pages are made and tested. Once a few combinations are done we are good to go with all others.   On mobile in the shed... 
Huh
This meme has already been going around for at least a week 
Love is the only force capable of transforming an enemy into friend.
Any captains in the thread?
Great to see Stratis receive nice coverage from mainstream media outlets for its sidechain release (albeit still alpha). I hope that more people get interested in the project once again - and it seems that some speculators have already responded to the news. I suspect that any short term spike may come down again pending BTC movement (I would be delighted if I prove to be wrong), but in the long run Stratis' outlook seems bright with its tech vision slowly but steadily coming to fruition :)
Cant fight the government with violence. They understand it and can respond with more violence than anyone is capable of.
Thank you 🙄 like what this dude said the same thing twice and tried to pretend the things were different 
Good idea. Blend them all together!
Yankee stadium needs to start booing Sonny. Maybe he will throw better knowing it doesn't matter anymore. Only up from here.
Funny that I do, and funny that you think because it happens in rats, that means it will in humans. Until there are human trials to show the same, it doesn't fucking matter.  There are so, *so* many things that never pan out from rat studies because - follow me here - **HUMANS AREN'T RATS**.
This picture makes me deeply uncomfortable. 
426) [gmarie2120](https://old.reddit.com/r/RandomActsofCards/comments/8qevs6/thank_you_for_all_the_snail_mail_love/)
I would love to see Putin laugh in his face, bitchslap him three times and then play the blackmail tape for all the world to see.    Only it is not a peetape. It shows Donald as he.... 
Thanks for the reply! I'm trying to be as active as I can and fill my time with hobbies and friends.
[**Adopt.  Adapt.  Improve.**](https://youtu.be/l8Fy7JwSZ2U?t=101)
If like an invite .. will be skiing soon 
More tics will make it last longer. &lt;3 Cheers you're hilarious.
Print signals 😂😂😂
HOLLOWPOINT*cough
I'd say they're more of an upper thigh, or maybe a lower back.
Do you and tony stark get along after he shot your arm off?
This sounds like supernatural communism. I'm out.
I'm not saying it will be easy, but I don't think there has to be manual inspection. They already have an algorithm/ way to detect cheaters and this could potentially narrow it down. 
If we got the two point conversion against osu in 2013 we beat Ohio state that year but probably then keep hoke for longer than just the 2014 season leading us to not get harbaugh and make us a worse program right now 
**Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.**   ___  ### LFG/Recruitment  We understand the desire to use the subreddit to find groups and advertise your discord and other communities.    The best place to find a group is on Discord in the official Fortnite server: https://discord.gg/fortnite ___  [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
Every so often it gets slow and bad, I just reboot and then it's fine again for a few days. If you're experiencing springboard crashes, it's a tweak. You can find out which one by looking at the crash log in Xcode
Lol
Could say the same for literally every American lifter haha
kinky
Okay, so when I was a sophomore in HS, there was this hot girl that was really into me. She always asked me to ride the bus with her, etc and I’d always decline because my sister drove me to school, and I wasn’t about to stoop to peasant levels.   Anyway, one Halloween she asked me to hand out candy with her at her house. She lived down the street so I said sure. A little before I was supposed to be there, she texts me and says that no one would be home. Now, my parents were strict, and I was terrified of getting caught, plus my two best friends who lived on my street asked me to hang. I said no to her.   It wasn’t until that night after everything that it hit me like a ton of bricks and all I could think was, “OH!”. Yeah, she didn’t really talk to me after that and was pretty ticked.
I don't know how to drive a stick, if you live in America it's not really necessary 
In best scenario
!invest 500
Possession is kinda even though, 46% : 53%. Just lack of energy and direction, it seems. IDK. Prob due to 64% humidity lol.
Get your gf pregnant
Thanks! Douse them in ACV and then rinse, or leave on after shampoo? 
YES! One of the keys for me is holding onto this gratitude. Thanks for sharing stranger. You can do this and follow in the steps of those that make you "want what they have to offer." For me that was peace &amp; purpose. 
Feigning courtesy.  It’s insulting; it’s obvious they don’t give a shit, they’re just pretending.  So the whole ordeal just becomes doubly insulting. B
yes people think that. yes people still get worked. even by a show written as transparently as raw. yes it's embarrassing but silver lining: also humourous.
Go away, Im batin.
Aim for 5 imo
the fuck is tolerance?   -jesus, circa 15 BC
Is it for an event? Did I miss out?
Your telescope is arranged like your future marriage partner. Pointing towards no one.
dumb fuckn whales
He spilled.
I have heard very good things about both those cans. If you are ok with 5.56 only the Turbo is the way to go. 
Thank you
My aunt is a 32 year old women that recently moved to my country (Australia) and she life mogged me within the first month. No joke she has a huge social circle and a fantastic job despite having no degree. Meanwhile i'm 10 years younger, lived here my whole life and have a bachelors in computer science yet still rot alone with no job. There's no sui fuel as potent as this, the difference between life on tutorial mode and life on suicide mode was a genetic coin toss.
Fubar888’s Palm Springs Mini 😍
your best bet is using a bot system but then you risk getting your account permanently banned!
Until you get your stuff destroyed by 5 aloes
I’m not saying life in the UK is a hellscape but I feel like it’s definitely declined as of late. 
5th of July is kinda lame
Size is the only factor here.  So yes, the Luc V6 should be able to accommodate the 2xx00. They are charged with the same Voltage.
Spironolatone, my testosterone blocker of choice, makes you crave salt.
Soto as of now due to Acunas DL stint but it will be fun to watch ROS
Oww you look really burnt
Arin and Danny of GG
Oh I just realized that this movie is where I'd heard him from.  This movie introduced me to Rogue Wave
"We will fuckin' kill you"--CIA
A bit overwhelmed by the positive comments, Thanks  everyone! Not sure how to post other photos to show build as I've only just signed up.  My wife suggested I made a steel circular bench for my brothers wedding anniversary, I bought a woodbending book by Lon Schleining. The first bench (the gift) was made of five pairs of concentric semicircles, the legs I designed I wasn't happy with, but there you go! Then I wanted one and on the basis of not making the same thing twice this bench was conceived, where the idea came from I have no idea but the benefit of this design all six wooden bits were the same.  I made a full size 'template' from four thicknesses of mdf in the form of the single turn spiral. It was mounted in a frame vertically so it could revolve. I bought some 'planks' of iroko 5m x 40cm x 8cm. Strips were cut off using a large table saw (with rollers on/off and a power feeder) each strip was then passed through the thicknesser to 5.5mm. and bundled in groups of 11, these were then glued (resorcinol) together and clamped round the template with f clamps into the 50+ pockets let into the template and the glue left to set. The end pieces were added latter. The legs bolt into brass threaded inserts, inserted from the top and then plugged.  I suppose I learnt that precision was key from the start, 5.6mm thick strips weren't going to work if some bits were 5.4mm! I made numerous templates for different stages. The angles were drawn out with a home made protractor that was fitted to the centre of the main template.  I neede at least four people to lay the glue with me and then clamp it up. the open and closed time for the glue was about an hour, a few dry runs confirmed we could do that in the time - it was a logistic exersise. I think eventually about twelve different people were involved in the six spirals.  The metal legs were constructed from laser cut steel sheet, they were designed and drawn out on a cad package and sent off, arriving back as a pallet of bits. They were welded up and then galvanised.  I suppose looking at it now it was a monumental effort, most people walk by it without any thought, nor do they wonder how you get it round the tree. Those that do wonder - woodworkers comment on the nice legs whilst steel workers coment on the spirals!  Time wise probably about 200hrs, Glue Lam is extremely wasteful in wood terms I suspect 75&amp;#37; ended up as sawdust.  Iroko because its an oily wood, it was available in the needed lengths and was affordable. Resourcinol glue (its a boat building glue) as the open time was long enough, its a two pack watterproof glue and its water to clean up, but it does need a high clamping pressure. Total cost with wood, glue and legs was probably about £1000  Overall it was the getting there working out how along with the logistics that was as important as the having got there.  Brian  PS How can I post further photos and a video?
That was the first thing I did when I turned on the tv
Standard scam. Man would have been walking round in fresh garb an creps chained up, prime target. 
Andy come back pls
But who gives a shit to begin with? That's even more stupid to keep a record of a dumb order
We all know how this ends. Cop shot black dog in the back.  
Lol this man is white 
Champion stacked sweatpants SIZE: L  7/10 worn a few times with care. Primarily looking for trades but if you really wanna buy them BIN:160$  I CAN ONLY DO APPLE PAY/VENMO
And you'll even save yourself a whopping 33 calories in the process!
imagine having to find size 48 shoes  when in reality some brands sell size 46s that are actually size 49 and size 47s that are actually size 45
Are you serious?
Word dude, that's exactly the type of conversation I was hoping would come out of the Duncan interaction.  Pretty much answers my question and also was an interesting look into what Ari experienced with his own moderate depression.  The get into it at the 1:58:45 mark of that JRE is anyone else is curious.  
I have a bad habit of forgetting that is a thing
Nothing you said is wrong, but you're ignoring the fact that Devs don't want to spend time on a new feature that isn't going to be used. It is very likely that people on console will be using a controller, and that those on pc will be using a mouse and keyboard, and those don't play well together on some games.  It's not a bullshit argument in the least.
They are just mad that Judge is secretly a Sox fan
Maybe the fact that this sort of question even comes up in their relationship is evidence that they attend a crazy church. 
And the Messi fanboys ignore the fact that Ronaldo led Real Madrid to a Champions League and Messi short the bed against Roma.
d-w-i-g-H-t
It is in a superposition until we open the box.
No need to say awkward I think you did excellent everything looked perfect to me 😋
I am a soldier and there are always meals with tears
Has he really been that good?  
The classix 2 are also known for their bass so those would be worth checking out too!
Freddie deserves a World Series
&gt;Opinion: Personally I think that "pretending" to be hateful and angry amounts to about the same thing anyways.  Yeah, as the people just saying things; it's still a million times better than the people who actually do things.
Thanks for the idea! This sounds very relaxing and nice :)
[RIP](https://puu.sh/AONVb/858165f49a.png)
Start cooking for my spouse
lol you gay
They probably also sell shirts that talk about how special they are because they were born in March.
“I am a black and white person, and you, my friend, are Grey”
Why would you ever sell anything you buy let alone to shitstop
I like this. Use the word date when confirming the plans and that way she can back out if she didn’t see it as such. I suspect that she did, but clarifying will put your mind at ease prior to dinner.
I bet you’re one of the lunatic Yankee fans that calls into WFAN or ESPN 
It’s ok guys, remember that derogatory Obama book they made back in 2008?  Wait a minute...
Put the album on shuffle.  Smoke a Joint. Shut ya mouth. Vibe. 
around new york  and if i messed up the grammar type it and il fix it
Just started it and it's a dude making squid tentacles with peanut butter and chuckling to himself. I'm going to enjoy this
&gt;Infinite stealth and Translocator allow her to play exactely how she was intended: staying in the backlines, hacking priority targets and finishing off weakened opponents. She can always show up at the worst time possible for her opponents.  Good Sombras were already capable of doing all of this effectively. They made it easier to do for people who've put less time in to being good with her at the expense of lowering her overall potential. 
Yes, I wanted the rain!
The only thing they’re missing is a nice load of cum. I’m sure anyone here would be happy to help
That's Wigan
6 runs and 56 pitches throw 1 2/3rds innings. wouldnt even be passable in the minors
I can imagine the Australian version would just read (Aussie accent) "All these fuckers are gonna kill ya mate!"
nice
Are you talking about on Youtube, or in his circulatory system?
What is dead can never die!
Yes it is!!
thats because most of the time when you turn on troubleshooter. the problem is not actually in your computer. so it has no way to do anything  when the problem is the computer itself it is excellent at solving them. fixing pretty much any problem. tampered with the network settings? some driver issues? accidentally turned of the network driver? forgot to turn of manual IP? the troubleshooter will fix it in a couple of seconds.  of course the average user never touches any of these settings in the first place, it is all on auto. so when you start the troubleshooter it is already a given that the problem is not with the computer. so all you see is the troubleshooter spending minutes to look for the issue, but it never finds anything.
That's not true at all actually. I would do some research if I were you
the whole opening is so good
Move to the West coast
It’s not what I would think. It’s what he thinks. So it looks a little small for him. 
ouch
If the delivery guy is autonomous from the kitchen, and most are, then yes. 
Hoisted by his own petard.
yeah they seem a bit stroggy how they assimilate human life and all that
Shovel knight treasure trove has tons of content and amazing level design and mechanics plus I found it hard.
Funnily enough it’s the exact opposite for me. I don’t really enjoy Legends 
Have you seen the rocket launch?
I see, is it save to delete the UR0 Trophy folder if I want to start fresh?
&gt; Yeah I think Harris does not deserve to get lumped in with the likes of Shapiro, Peterson and similar ilk.  He does, because they cater to the same audience. He's also a textbook "scientific racist" who believes foreign policy in the Middle East should involve the murder of a billion people.  There's nothing reasonable about him or significantly different than other Nazi sympathizers.
Agreed, and it does not need to stop the game.  Player stops game, Ref goes to VAR hood.  Determines legitimacy of game stoppage, cards awarded for either egregious fouls or faking.  No card awarded if  accidental and real hurt.
You having amazing eyes!
VRV seems to not respond to tickets for days at a time unfortunately. Very poor customer service any time I've had an issue.   I almost can't believe it's the same company as crunchyroll, who usually responds the same day and is usually quite helpful.
Yeah really possibly they would pick recent season casts way more than old season ones. But, like survivor HvV had Sandra, Colby, Stephanie, Tom, Rupert, Jerri and Rob. SC had PG, Savage, Fishbach, Terry, Varner, Kimmi and Wigles. So, there is a hope to see the kinda balanced cast.
One cannot affect their own present by interacting with the past. That just creates alternate timelines.
Well no. It's that there's no 'apache', or anything that could be interpreted as one. I watched it 3 times waiting for the rest of it to load before checking the timestamp, backing out, and down voting.
She also said she's been with him for 5 years in her pre-house interview.
Actual session: "The Dersite newspaper headlines read 'Assasination attempt made on archagent with exploding paper shredder' and 'Prince of Space caught red-handed saving frog'".  The Sufferer is basically Jesus, if Jesus married a catgirl, one of the disciples had laser eyes, the Virgin Mary was a vampire, Pontius Pilate built robots, and instead of Jesus rising from the dead, Peter Pan and Captain Hook used his legacy to start a rebellion against Space Tiberius.
China is also importing it to Mexico, which then comes across the Mexican border. But keep up that sarcastic wit of yours.
I would love to see a dual interview between you and Nardwuar.  You two are the best personalities that Much ever broadcast.
He'll be amazing for San Diego.
I supported trump in the election only cause he was the better of the two evils. I honestly can’t stand the guy and when I come on reddit to get away from the shit, I see it anyway and it infuriates me. The best thing to do is just block the posts. I feel your pain man
I'm in love with your dog!
  *500 MemeCoins were successfully invested!*  You bought in at 4 upvotes.  Your new balance is 295 MemeCoins.  In 4 hours your investment will be evaluated and I will update this comment. Stay tuned!   UPDATE: Your investment was unsuccessful!  You lost 83 MemeCoins.  Your current balance is 712 MemeCoins.
I'm good with just banning Laker fans. Obviously I hope PG stays with OKC but if he has to go, I hope he goes ANYWHERE but LA. Their fans never have anything intelligent to contribute to basketball discussions, they just downgrade the quality of this forum with their lame/trash posts and upvoting/downvoting nonsense. It's pretty obvious they don't have any friends in real life. I'd love to see if this is how they interact socially in real life...because they'd get punched in the face very often.
When the Yankee fans give up all hope of winning so they just come here to start downvoting..
And now i'm getting sad.  Damn that song is still beautiful...As well as this pic.
Of all those movies (weird choices to list btw) I think Iron Man and Ragnarok are good. What I do think is interesting though is that two of the best MCU films in my eyes are essentially two completely different genres, with Ragnarok amounting to what is basically a superhero buddy cop comedy, and Iron Man being a gritty origin story. I think it’s cool that they test the waters with so many different approaches but to be completely honest most of the time it leads to a pretty OK film. 
This was my favorite sign from the rally: https://i.redd.it/jj2p7mzs58711.jpg
This look is out of this world. 
music by yann tiersen
those are laminated too
WOW downvoted already LMFAO. 
Are you willing to give up andujar or Torres plus Frazier, Sheffield and more?
Leia was an active political figure in the new republic and so was Luke, people didn’t like Vader but respected the Skywalker for their Jedi origins and abilities.  Secondly the resistance was built on republic ships that they didn’t feel like maintaining or using anymore so the B wings would have been the perfect option to give to the resistance to lower maintenance cost for the fleet  Thirdly the republic had just beaten the first order in open war only a few years before episode 7 and many politicians did want to help the resistance, hence the resistance being given the Rattice in TLJ
They try to jump off fucking everything. Also, take care of his teeth. Even with brushing and daily hygiene my 13 year old has 2 left. By the time I got him at 5, the damage was done.
What’s it’s top speed?
Angie and Kaitlyn's beliefs definitely aren't any crazier than all this exorcism talk...
Beautiful
Where do you go to use him already?
Crazy to think that FF 7, 8 and 9 all came out in a span of 3 1/2 years.   They for sure had more than one team working on all of these but still after the ps1 era releases for FF slowed down massively.
Well idk what happens after about 15 seconds because I can't make it more than 15 seconds into it, but the first 15 seconds made me cringe a lot.
Love this I will work to make it happen
Plot twist: it's a card game rigged with microtransactions
Upgrade to a tactical pen, then you'll be overprepared!
I can't even imagine him doing that to magic. That would be the most disrespectful thing in history. 
For me, all of the D deficient symptoms went away, but it took 6+ months to get my levels optimal.  I’m not sure what your Doctor considers low, I know for a while it was around 30, and they were considering changing it to 50 (I’m not sure if the did or not).  Once I hit high 40’s I felt normal again.  A side note... if the joint pain has started/ increased since you started supplementing D, you may want to consider adding a magnesium supplement too.  Once your body starts getting the D it needs, it starts using it to repair stuff it was not prioritizing when it was deficient, and it can burn through a lot of other vitamins you aren’t thinking about as well.  IIRC, you can wind up with symptoms of magnesium deficiency - including joint pain, once you start supplementing vitamin D.  Best of luck!  D deficiencies suck!
bad bot
Now, dope is life.
You don't always have to put in so much work. Sometimes you just get back home after the first date and give it a shot. 
I actually think this is much better framed and lit than BvS. 
added
Was solidified as a starter near the end of last season. Not guaranteed to be the starter going into this season, though. Still has to prove himself. 
Do you still need help?
Steam ID: [https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198048233227] (https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198048233227)  Server:  US W/E  Tier: 8 Immortal rank 700  Preferred Role 3, can be an okay 4  Other Information: love me the ginger
Have you tried Double Dragon? I haven't been there in a decade but they use to have woks and other cooking stuff. Might try and call them.
Let’s just say no one would be able to complain about a dirty beach again.
Bruh do you even LIKE basketball?
So you're telling me the show hosted by a conservative on MSNBC failed? I'm really shocked.
THIS IS ALL ME.
I miss tanakula
Clearly, he didn't learn the lesson being taught.
Your post has been removed. Due to the amount of people posting the daily shop, including new items, we are allowing the stormshieldonebot to post the list of daily items, including a quality screenshot of the store daily from yourboytay so the sub does not get flooded with shop sale posts. Thank you for your understanding. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/FortNiteBR) if you have any questions or concerns.*
U
Where exactly is this happening where Mexicans legally here are being rounded up in ghettos? What policy is that?
So in other words you don't know what it means? You can't tell me if that was a free will injury or a health effect.  Interesting how you take the government stats you agree with though.  *But the health problems caused by alcohol may kill you slower*   Lol what? That is called being more healthy. You die at 40 from cigarettes and 60 from alcohol...that pesky alcohol was killing you for longer.  &gt; all those health issues wouldn't it?  No cuz you don't know what it means. They chose alcohol and they chose to drive. We don't order people how to be healthy. Next we will be forcing people to exercise. 
Yes, the point being we cannot hold them with or without their children. and as for "not being used currently" "The Casa Padre shelter, a state-licensed child care facility, houses two sets of undocumented youth — those who were separated from their relatives by the Trump administration’s family-separation policy and those, like the missing teenager, who had illegally crossed the border unaccompanied by a parent or guardian. The majority were unaccompanied youth." it's far from the only one, and note this one in particular talked about ~1500 kids.
It will be *very* hard. Of course you still care about him You will also be sad. This is natural and will pass.  Then...  You'll feel sooo relieved. That oppressive weight lifted. No more perpetual fear of getting smacked and horrible cousins. You will feel HOPEFUL and FREEE! You sound really sweet and deserve a partner that cherishes you. Lifts you up, not tears you down &lt;3 
TERA NOVA ???
I scuba dive but dont freedive/spearfish. There is a scuba shop right by the pier that probably can hook you up with nearby spearfishers.
U
I just select Notes and then cancel...even less likely to accidentally share something!
Just for clarity: It's the "enforcing immigration" bullshit that I think is retarded and trolling.
**Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.**   ___  ### Frequently Posted Topics  Please [use the search](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortniteBR/search?q=&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;sort=relevance&amp;t=all) before posting about something. Topics that become excessive and or redundant due to being posted with an abnormal frequency are subject to removal. “Breaking news” style topics are included in this. We will only allow one thread per topic, with Epic and Moderator threads taking priority.  * Feel free to view our [Epic Plz Wiki here](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortniteBR/wiki/epicplz), it will be updated whenever the community begins to overwhelmingly express one similar concerns about one topic. If there is no meaningful developments into said topics, threads can and will be removed under this rule.  * When something big hits, it’s not uncommon to see dozens of posts on the same topic fill the front page at the same time. Unfortunately, this means that content creators or community contributors don’t get to share submissions they have spent time on. As a result, duplicate posts, or similar posts around the same topic will be removed - with the first submitted allowed. However, official posts made by Epic or the Mod team take priority, and removals of these duplicate threads will be made at a moderator's discretion.  ___  [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
Snow level and tropical /water level 
&gt; Without ICE, who is going to enforce immigration laws?  Don’t need them if you have a simple path to citizenship.  If you make everything easier for the good people that want to be here, you will see a drastic cut down in Coyotes and Human Smuggling.  &gt; How can we prop up a country like Mexico without invading and seizing control of their government when the cartel has control of all of the government. This year alone there has been 133 politicians murdered by the cartel. All because the didn’t comply with their orders or because they dared to stand against them.  I don’t have a great answer for this yet but propping up their dollar and using our influence for good instead of turning a blind eye to corruption. It’s weird we care more about Israel than we do our neighbor and second closest ally.   &gt; When you end the war on drugs, what would your restrictions be for who can possess them, how much of it, and at what age.  Look people that want drugs are going to find a way to get them. The money fighting said drugs would be much better used keeping people out of jail and off the streets and getting them the healthcare they need to fight their addiction. 
Yeah, don't you normies I'm know how to create new 20 year old content of other people?
✔️ | **HD** | [Away Feed **HD** 6600kbps](http://www.cominstream.com/live-stream/1002-380630113?link=1) | [Home Feed **HD** 6600kbps](http://www.cominstream.com/live-stream/1002-380630113?link=2) | Ad overlays: 0 | Clicks: 2 | Works on all devices | Disable AdBlock: Yes.
I mean compared to 28 other teams, that's a nice problem to have.
We've answered all of OP questions at length and multiple times in telegram.
You can just say nigga. This sub embraces hip hop culture (unlike those bitches at /r/soccer)  [screenshot](https://i.imgur.com/J8lpIzM.png) 🔥 [mirror](http://callan.io/hhcj_images/t3_8v61l2.png) 🔥 [archive](http://callan.io/hhcj_dumps/t3_8v61l2-1530403209.html)
Ya'll need to remember there is more than one dimension
(Pumped up kicks)
Triforce! #5: Weekly shop :) 
I love mine because I can pack it full of the groceries I need during that trip and don't end up spending $200 on impulse stuff that's going to sit in my freezer until I finally get around to wanting to cook the specific meal I had in mind when I grabbed it
TLDR: totally and utterly go ahead with this fantastic idea!  I'm stoned in front of a Vietnam war documentary so this may go on a bit.  Bit of background: I put together a few Oldrim mods back in the day. Went in knowing basically nothing, learned through the Bethesda videos, CK wiki and experimentation. And lots and lots of forum trawling - Reddit would have been easier. Now with VR, I'm slowly porting my old mods to SE. I've got the bug again, and I'm surprised at how much has stuck in my brain. Here is some of it.  Creating a mod of any significant size is a much bigger job than it looks. My own efforts are all small, but took a huge amount of time to  nail down. Even [this one](https://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/mods/57557).  Your idea is well-suited to the position of First Mod Ever. You can start small, just that dickhead in Falkreath. Figure out what you need to do to do what to want to do (hmm), get it working, and iterate slowly.  From what I remember (not much, never actually modded dialogue...), you'll need to add a condition to the dialogue topic, and a trigger volume to "flip the switch". This may require scripting, and you may require a dummy quest to hold things together. For sure this is like skinning a cat, workflow would be something along these lines:  1. Add a conditional check to stop the dialogue option appearing. Test. You shouldn't be able to ask him about the cemetery *at all*.  2. Add a trigger volume somewhere easily identifiable - directly outside the priest's would be a good spot. Set the trigger to unlock the dialogue option when entered. Test again, see if going there makes the dialogue option available.  3. Move, resize, reshape the trigger volume appropriately. You might find a **debug.notification** useful for testing the boundaries in game.  Document every change you make, and why. Screenshots of text fields are good for this. Makes it much easier to rethink your changes, and to duplicate them elsewhere.  If you want a funnish project to learn the CK on, watch and copy the Lokir's Tomb tutorial on the Creation Kit wiki. It's still relevant (the interface hasn't changed since 2011) and by the end you'll know your way around both the interface and the game data. There are other CK vidz on the tubez, if you can find a decent dialogue-focussed one then hooray.  If you go public, take the time to give your mod a name you're happy with. I'm dead proud of [Cats in the Dark](https://www.nexusmods.com/skyrim/mods/51589/) - it's short, descriptive, and a pretty good song as well.  And a final tip- you'll be adding records whatever you do; prefixing them with your (or the mod's) initials makes them MUCH easier to find, as well as being a huge help to other modders who're patching or "learning from" your work. Also if you come back in a few years, you can see how you did what you did.  You've come up with a great idea and you should think about where else you can take it in future. Perhaps the confition could be clearing X dungeons, or reaching quest stage Y. There's a lot of potential here.  Best of luck and if there's any chance I can be of help, please do get in contact.
But they have places to be!
[Unlucky Mustang in Mudgee](https://np.reddit.com/r/australia/comments/6n5hhw/unlucky_mustang_in_mudgee/)
You should be proud. Sober and covered in feet.
Gayyyyy
is it possible he honestly thought he was talking to the tree in your picture? call him a sap and see how he takes it
Read that as give her small pox with cookies
Ouch, thanks Hollywood. 
No, some just wear rubber gloves and keep the hand sanitizer nearby.
Look into abolishing ICE, it’s not at all what you describe.
This pretty much ruined my day.  And ice cream.
 We’re back to Africa boys 
Mine came with 2 SATA cables, the front header cables of course, and a little speaker.
I do like thing tho. It funny
im saying....i wanna make his dick wet,but no reply. Im mad
RAB2-RAB2... , Turn off DEP in CMD, Apply Graphics Tweak, install Bullring and DMR mods. Yeah, I've installed and re-installed that game dozens of times in the past decade! Every one of my (and family) PC's still have that sim!
You didn't answer mine, either. Now we're even.
Yes we do 
&gt; Average guys would be surprised how much a girl can let you get away with if she's attracted to you.   That was always a mystery for me growing up. Guys slapping girls' asses and stuff like that and girls would just laugh it off. I would've gotten absolutely crucified had I done that.
Shitting ults?  Like shitting bricks
Unfortunately, that’s no longer a guarantee.
You could hang like that past my throat and ass.
This is poor advice for someone who obviously isn't colocated. This person (or any of us by ourselves) have 0 chance at successfully doing exchange arbitrage. Citadel and the like are running FPGAs with an entire team of professionals and you think a retail trader can pick them off? Not a chance. 
Lol 
[Cat 4](https://twitter.com/noesis1568/status/1012876853068029952)
Curious - How would you do it?
I'm not trying to avoid the "is mexico *safe enough* question", I'm dismissing it on the grounds that while the answer is probably "***not*** *safe enough*", the safeness or otherwise of refugees in Mexico is pointless to consider if we question the original policy of detaining and separating the families of asylum seekers. There is no reason that they can't remain the US when seeking asylum. That's how a fucking asylum system works, /u/AlphaTenken...
You ever see that scene from Cheech in Chong (I think it's Up in Smoke) where the chick sees Chong holding a paper plate of Ajax, grabs it, snorts it and makes the weird elephant sounds?! Omg that's you. LMFAO
My favorite part of that is that millen straight up said he would suck 
Someone compared a soccer player with an nba player on here and all the replies were something like "get that basketball shit out of here". I go on different baseball subreddits and start talking about MLS and the world cup and everyone's so cool about it. Idk what's wrong with this sub
Ha very unique process the result is well worth it stay creative
zoz
Patung-patong ang problema dyan. Just look at the picture.   1. Ang MMDA enforcers nasa tapat ng Farmers kasi roon ang tamang sakayan at babaan. Usad pagong ang mga bus kahit pukpukin ng batuta.   2. Since commission based ang mga drivers at konduktor, hindi aandar ang mga bus kasi gusto nilang mapuno. Ayaw din nilang matapat sa enforcers kasi papaalisin na sila sa loading bay/lane. Sa malayo sila nagsasakay. Expect a bus to stay idle in Cubao for around 30 minutes.   3. Sa north-bound, dalawa ang loading bay/lanes. Meron sa gitna at meron sa gilid. Yung mga nagmamadali na, bumababa na kaagad kahit wala pa sa tamang bus stop. Yung mga tangang pasahero naman na sasakay, sasalubungin na kahit alam nilang hindi rin makakaandar kasi marami pang mga bus sa unahan na ayaw umalis.   4. Masyado ng masikip sa EDSA Cubao dahil nakuha ng underpass at MRT yung ibang lanes. Same situation also happens at EDSA Shaw pero hindi ganyan kalala.
well at least he had the intelligence to do it :) 
This thread was crossposted from https://www.reddit.com/r/LiveFails/comments/8v61pu made by /u/ dedotated-wam. To mute xpost notifications, send a PM.
You said he's a 4* and he's not a 4*
But for real tho I’m gonna be heated if PG just re-signs in OKC. Cause that means he doesn’t care about market size and thinks he has a better chance winning there than here. Smh 
Trans-light polka-dotted pigs with wings and antennae?
I remember the day that shit dropped. I couldn’t believe what I was hearing. Just turned the radio on in my red rose, white ceiling...
Drgenial estaría orgulloso. 
Being blocked by these scammers is a badge of honor, and is evidence of your knowledge and common sense. Welcome. u/Patrick_Spens can you find some more chairs?
Whenever somebody says that I always say "Someone's trash is another's treasure!'
10. You 9. Can’t 8. Rank 7. The 6. Office 5. Episodes 4. By 3. Cringe 2. Scott’s Tots 1. Dinner Party 
Not only does it have to meet the EFT test, we also have to meet a list of Electromagnetic Compatibility (EMC) tests. I am mostly having trouble meeting radiated emissions limits.  One thing I have noted, and I don't know if the EU had this in mind, was that meeting these tests helps with [EMP survival](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Electromagnetic_pulse) of electronic devices. Including [nuclear EMP](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_electromagnetic_pulse).
Personally, I don't subscribe to the 'everything happens for a reason' thing. Sometimes shit just happens, you don't have to be happy about it.  It seems you love your son with all your heart, but not his autism. 
Source?
zle
Smart
Sounds like we have similar taste in books! Which makes me glad I got The Hazel Wood from the library...  I love Holly Black, and The Cruel Prince did not disappoint! Although I wish we'd gotten a little more description of Faerie--half the time I felt like the characters were existing in a big blank space! But the characters were so compelling, and that ending, oh my lord!!!!!  January can't come fast enough.  Interested in what you think of Three Dark Crowns! I thought it and the sequel were so interesting and different from the majority of books in their genre. 
Dont be mad at LeBron cause you hate your dad. 
I have a pair coming in lmk if u wanna meetup
Your post has been removed. Due to the amount of people posting the daily shop, including new items, we are allowing the stormshieldonebot to post the list of daily items, including a quality screenshot of the store daily from yourboytay so the sub does not get flooded with shop sale posts. Thank you for your understanding. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/FortNiteBR) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Love all of the above! 
So because some people are fat other people deserve to go bankrupt because they got cancer or hit by a car?   The fact is, fuck you and your money other people's lives matter more than the meager fortune you hoarded for yourself.
Aside from having more workspace, you mean?
That’s coooooool
Watch a bunch of hockey games, you'll find yourself drawn to some team's style of play or to certain players.  I don't think you can decide arbitrarily before hand, unless you're just going to choose a team by which one is closest to where you live.
zozzle
Wow awesome! Would this fit sleeved cards too? 
Zoro around 500M (equal to Law) and Sanji 400 ish.
People like Thai blame rot because they’re good and only recently have other clans even stood a chance.  There’s literally no proof rot ddos anyone 
Watch gone girl with him
They're no better than the new quests the old school team are making though, and their devs are just new graduates working on a shoe string budget. 
Calisthenics like pullups and pushups and the like are just fine. Just don't run/jump. It's just such a minimal benefit in exchange for such a big payment.
Don't worry, he still listens to *their* calls.
The playerbase Is a lot on xbox but its not on PC
Before public companies were required to yet audited they all did it anyways. It decreases their cost to finance their company. No one is going to want to invest in a company unless they know their financial statements are accurate.
Why is Oliver such a common name for orange cats?
Nick and Aaron carter
"You're going the wrong wayyyy!"
Nope. My wife has no problems with it. My manager and my coworkers (all honest people I'm close with) all say there's no problem. I asked today and one of my coworkers actually said she only showers every 2 or 3 days too and she smells fine. 
as a cudi fan...  you’re very right
Yeah, the help is still needed. We're at the inner wall bonfire in the ringed city, and your help would be appreciated. 
Za 5-10 lat macior będzie wykładał w Moskwie za miliony rubli
Fuck you for not accepting reality.
I
Devout atheists are worse than their Christian counterparts, in my experience. It’s embarrassing to be atheist with people like this running around 
Like surfing the web, using the internet like it was meant to?  DDoS'ing in OSRS is sooo common, we can't blame the individuals any more.
And last season until 10 days of Eddie before we signed Monroe. Happens all the time.
Loving your pseudo 50’s parlance. You may be my fave Redditor for today. Their first album was an absolute meisterwerk, second so bad- to these ears- that nothing that they could possibly release afterwards would meet with my approval, in some ways exactly the cross that I non-coincidentally had to bear amongst my stepdad’s aged old soak pals; all credibility destroyed. See also George Lucas post 1999. And Sigur Ros, after the ‘two sausages kissing’ album (also known as the ‘believing your own press’ LP)
So glad you made another one my dude I was chuckling 😆😆
Oh really?   http://www.meatpoultry.com/articles/news_home/Product_Formulation/2017/05/Adding_natural_red_color_to_me.aspx?ID=%7BC4706156-BDA8-494C-A313-086E1D6F732C%7D&amp;cck=1
Damn, been a while since I came multiple times!
So that you can have your step stool back
This is all coming to a head i feel.
E
Does anyone else find it amusing that she recently called for the harassment of Trump officials only to cancel an event due to harassment?   Of course not, that would require some intellectual honesty.
Honestly is a Good bot
 ###Clip mirrored. [View mirror on Streamable.](https://streamable.com/zn0am)  *****  ^This ^is ^a ^bot. ^You ^can ^message ^the ^moderators ^[here.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FLiveFails)   
The majority of that damage was from *his* feathers being pulled back in.  The best strategy to get a contested baron is to combo your most damaging ability with the smite, and he only did half of that combo for some reason...  EDIT: Specifically, the 890-90 was his feathers.  Maybe something else hit then too but his feathers hit during that damage tick.  He should have combo'ed it then and it would've been basically guaranteed.  It's not a reaction, because people can't react to that timing window, it's a pre-planned consecutive execution of two buttons at virtually the same time.  
This comment is being removed for Rule 3. Please refer to it before commenting again. Thanks.
Why would you care if you didn't crave porn or other people if you found someone you hit it off with?
Tempered glass protectors my dude, they'll save your screens. 
Was it the detainment building at the edge of Little Tokyo?
Humanity. 
M
For me it’s all portion control - I don’t have PCOS which I know can complicate things but I’ve had success just eating pre-dished out amounts, meal prep style. Makes it easier to not eat a ton if I don’t have it in front of me. 
Holy shit dude. You're awesome.
Wow, that's actually a good idea! I'll discuss it with the other moderators. Thank you for this suggestion.
My Schwartz is bigger than yours
You could always build a Circu/Oona storm deck. Search for Oona budget storm list on this subreddit for the skeleton. Your plan is to find Ad Naus into high tide/rituals and then kill them with Storn+Reservoir or Scepter. The core is extremely cheap (especially since you already play Azami and have some of the staples) and you fill out the rest of the deck with whatever nuts and bolts you have lying around, i.e. one mana counters/tutors/removal/discard. After you build the deck, you slowly upgrade over time with the power cards, the good black tutors and mana positive rocks etc (I recommend starting with YawgWin if you couldn't afford it while building).  When I built it it wasn't really that consistent and T3-4 wins were not common; you need more mana to kick off since you run less broken rocks and sometimes it will just spin its wheels even while goldfishing and you don't really do anything. (Tbf it could also be that I'm just a terrible pilot). But it's very rewarding to figure out the lines, every upgrade boost the deck a ton since you ideally see a lot of cards every game, and eventually you will be playing Kess like you wanted to.
No but I heard shitloads about parents trying to smuggle their kids over the border... no not even that. It was ”Trump separates children from their parents, Putting children in cages.” That was what I heard. 
This post sponsored by [Circlejerk discord](https://discord.gg/0wa8Ct08N5SuehqX). Great post®  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/circlejerk) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Still waiting for game mechanics/systems be added that promote the formation of lines and team play like in War of Rights
Tell me a person who doesn't want those things, I'll wait.
At 4 runs, I would have thought the pen was a good idea. But 6, even with our offense, against Sale seems highly unlikely. 
&gt;But when using the microphone feature to check if everything's in tune, each of my strings tends to register ~1/4 tone flat. If I tune everything up to where the app registers it as "in tune," all my strings sound sharp compared to a drone.  A 1/4 tone off means something is wrong.  Either your ears aren't hearing 5ths right or the app is configured wrong or generally bugged.  If you tune perfect 5ths, then E and D will each register 2 ET cents off and G 4 cents off.  If you tune equal tempered 5ths, they won't sound in tune no matter what.
26604 rotation passing
That’s the only one I’ve taken pics of, but I’ll keep it in mind and start uploading some of them.
How the fuck does that shit cunt Geiger have a refereeing license?
Now that you mention it, I don't look forward to ever trying it into Singed.
What is an MTS?
Damn.. you’re kind of pathetic but I definitely don’t wish you were dead. But to each their own. I hope you can lead a life filled with less hatred
\[Paul George potentially meeting with Magic after Partying in OKC\]([https://flightaware.com/live/flight/JNY297/history/20180630/1430Z/PHOG/KOKC](https://flightaware.com/live/flight/JNY297/history/20180630/1430Z/PHOG/KOKC))
Again, nice argument  I've stated nothing but facts and you've done nothing but  insult me.   Give me your op.gg, let's see this "high elo xayah god"
RIP U
haha 420 lol roflmao
And who would be out 5th starter?
And totally great!
Ball hogging with our starters.
What the fuck are you talking about?  I'm saying the US is on the road to concentration camps.  A person saying this is how we end up with gas chambers is an enabler of fascism? That is possibly the stupidest comment I have ever encountered on reddit. Go to hell.
invite to tour the new stadium next year
but it's not 4's fault that 5 and 6 are the way they are. 4 still kept the horror atmosphere and vibe, even if it wasn't survival horror. 5 totally just went into an action monster fighting game, almost 0 horror, and 6 was like playing an interactive michael bay movie.  that isn't 4's fault, capcom could have made 5 and 6 into action horror games like 4 was. hating 4 because 5 and 6 are bad (even though, they aren't bad at all, just not great, and just not horror games) is dumb. 4 is an amazing game.
Trade completed: /u/Dvl_Brd traded SHADES to /u/spacesoulboi for CRAB.
If I knew they had been tested and were clean, I wouldn't think much of it. 
Hey,   My guild &lt;Syntax Error&gt; is currently recruiting. We're on Mal'ganis. We're currently doing an alt raid on Mondays and pushing M+ on Wed and Friday. 8 - 11pm CST. We're mostly focusing on helping guildies gear toons for the next expansion but everyone's pretty experienced raiders.   Feel free to add my btag BlueIntimacy#1855. It'd be cool to have you join our alt raid on Monday to see if our guild is a good fit. 
Go go  Go Jun go go  Go Jun go go  Go Jun go go  Go Jun go go  Jun hasegawa
PUBG is better
Not suicide it is stop living
Right now in TrueReddit there's people comparing it to the Chinese Exclusion Act... favorably.   And then getting super salty when you ask how that's not bigotry. 
Happened to me too. The name of the video was "untitled" i changed the name and it worked.
Killer bee? What kind of nickname is that gorgi?
A
Orwen took the drink happily. Been too long since he'd had a drop. Strong stuff for a casual meeting by Westerosi standards, but he wasn't complaining.  *"Funny. Everyone on the Wall tells us you'd do the same thing. I came here half expecting to die. Pleasant surprise, honestly."* He laughed, motioning to the decently welcoming longhouse within which they sat.  *"Aye, I was a builder. Made sure the gates didn't fall down when the wilder folk came knocking and made sure the barracks we slept in didn't collapse on us."*  He gestyred to the door. *"If you think I'm leaving, think again for a second. I'm a deserter from the Watch. All that waits for me if I go south is a spear up the arsehole from the Nightrunners, or getting beheaded by the Lord Commander for desertion. No, I'd much rather stay."*
Man I’m late af to this post but I worked produce at Walmart for a while in the summer and the managers there went berserk about putting out corn around July 4th. 
Where were teachers like you at my school? You saved my life
That's uh... that's my point. They refuse to acknowledge that they intentionally bottleneck certain gear, and claim they don't.
As per the rules in the side bar, yes or no questions such as "Does anyone else" or "Has anyone else" (or variants thereof) are not allowed in post titles.  Please repost with a more specific question, such as "How do you manage this symptom?" instead of "Does anyone else have this symptom."  You'll get better answers and more replies. Please see the rule explanation [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/adhd/wiki/rules#wiki_ask_a_question_that_can_be_answered_with_simply_yes_or_no).  We appreciate your understanding, thank you.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/ADHD) if you have any questions or concerns.*
"Squabbling just makes things more lively. I welcome it. Say you're that billionaire, Tirion Powers, aren't you? Fancy seeing someone like you at a place like this."
Sent you one from 8680 8701 6121 (BC, Canada).
* Username: /u/the_judge_168 * Join date: 2015-05-26 18:26:35 * Link karma: 3511 * Comment karma: 1885 * Reputation: 106 trade(s) * Heatware: [http://www.heatware.com/u/111101/to](http://www.heatware.com/u/111101/to)  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^It ^^is ^^being ^^provided ^^to ^^help ^^potential ^^trade ^^partners ^^have ^^more ^^immediate ^^background ^^information ^^about ^^with ^^whom ^^they ^^are ^^swapping. ^^Please ^^be ^^sure ^^to ^^familiarize ^^yourself ^^with ^^the ^^[RULES](https://www.reddit.com/r/mechmarket/wiki/rules/rules) ^^and ^^other ^^guides ^^on ^^the ^^[WIKI](https://www.reddit.com/r/mechmarket/wiki/index)
Damn.  You’re hair is banging, I need to find a girl who has curls like that. 
Sorry /u/kamikoKit, your submission has been removed from /r/softwaregore for the following reason:   * **Rule 3:** No Overposted Content. A list of content which is posted frequently [can be found here.](https://www.reddit.com/r/softwaregore/wiki/overposted-content)  Your post isn't entirely right for /r/softwaregore. A better subreddit might be /r/pbsod . --- *If you feel this was done in error, or would like further clarification, please don't hesitate to [message the mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fsoftwaregore&amp;subject=Request to Review My Submission&amp;message=My submission was removed by a moderator. I would like some clarification.%0A%0AHere's the relevant information for my post:%0A%0ATitle: Was driving by this sign. I had to do a double-take to make sure I wasn’t hallucinating.%0A%0APermalink: https://www.reddit.com/r/softwaregore/comments/8v4wv8/-/)*
Go to sleep ho, go to sleep, if you’re tired be quiet and go to sleep. Luda
THE CARDINAL WAY BRO
Gotcha. Thanks for responding!
Mambo No. 5 by Lou Bega
I am ashamed to admit that I also want that.
I honestly thought you moved for a work opprtunity. Who knew?   Your perspective on distance is also funny (in a relative sense). I've moved all over the Midwest in the States, 100s of miles, but I don't feel like I've ever really lived anywhere particularly different. It's all basically the same  down here with very minor differences. Very exciting.
Were they ever together tho?
It’s annoying because the cousins I have living near me a super bratty and spoiled and the ones who live many states away a fun and interesting 
So free movement of people means nothing?
I tried not to act like a super fan lol.
Really hope so. But also hoping and praying it isn't what I have a feeling it could be.
Wow, so Spotify will literally break their own service if you pay them enough money?  It looks like they've swapped out a lot (all?) playlists and genres for exclusively Drake content.   I don't listen to Drake, and Spotify has degraded their service to promote him. I want my money back for reduced service quality (not, seriously).
As someone that had a stalker before no, women can be dangerous too. We desappear for our own safety. http://www.nydailynews.com/news/crime/ny-news-woman-machete-exboyfriend-sex-20180627-story.html
Please consider this, would love to follow along
Now you just overheat when you go on high speed for too long.  I used to go “eh, what’s the worst the Reapers can do?”   Not anymore.
I concur. I will be forever grateful for Regan bringing the country back to a conservative default on all issues and breaking the Soviet Union diplomatically. However, what Trump has done has saved conservative thought on a *global* scale while fighting against soft Communism at home.
Yall would hate the format we use for Action Henk runs then.  But then, the very nature of Action Henk makes it basically IL: The Game for our tournament format.  5 minutes per level, you can run the stage as many times as you feel like, winner is the runner with the best sum of best over the stages ran that round.  It works well when you can reset the stage to your heart's content with no penalty. 
Hopefully that doesn't randomly deal 8 damage to your room
No need to imagine, friend. :)
&gt; would lose a lot of respect  I don't see that, these are probably the same people telling everybody here that they have complete trust in DN whatever story they want to tell. So they should be able to trust them with that as well.
Two people spread some conspiracy theory that she is illiterate. Twitter went wild with it but she denied it gracefully.  Buzzfeed Article https://www.buzzfeed.com/shylawatson/lea-michele-cant-read-theory  Her response: https://twitter.com/LeaMichele/status/976915072730636288?s=19
15 USD
To be fair, you don't hear about the underdogs that still failed 
Yeah, definitely before 1 a.m. east time we'll have a few signings of at least smaller players. Guys like Joe Harris.
Joke's on them, I'm a male too.
28 days; about 5 days of bleeding. I have a copper IUD.
I have the same blanket it's incredibly cozy.
every alarm in the house set.  just in case I am wandering around aimlessly right close to then.  :p
/u/Banamo_jo, you have received a 100 [BANANO](http://banano.co.in) tip. You can view this transaction on [BananoVault](https://vault.banano.co.in/transaction/C13470955EE9727EC712EA3321F1FC97B7CDA105732B244D52AB8F14A284A08E) Go to the [wiki](https://np.reddit.com/r/bananocoin/wiki/reddit-tipbot) for more info
"I thought you were older." This was her first message to me on Tinder, coming up on 1 year together
30% of the country would have said that the day he took office.  This is also the 30% that seems to support everything Trump says and does.  If we were grading on a curve, the bottom 30% are getting Cs or worse.
But you support him in general? And you will vote for him in the next election?  God forbid, if some misfortune happens to you, and while running away, you tresspass on someones property, and he takes your child away, I guess you would think thats fair? Because thats who you are voting for.  If a prominent member of society, who you respect a lot, grabbed your daughter/wife/mom by the pussy, you would still support him?
On the ground, heals and AOE spam.  With the heals you're stupid hard to kill.  Tricorder Scan has a really low cooldown and debuffs targets, plus one of your traits boosts your damage against debuffed targets on top.  Then offensively you start popping out powers like Exothermic Induction Field or Hyperronic Radiation, which a fantasy RPG would call Fireball or Poison Field.  Think like you're playing a wizard and start magically nuking things.
Drop it.
Your generation is doomed lol
Aren't you the guy who posted his fat fetish artwork here and got rightfully told off for it?
You need a different rating system.  You give all the dogs 10/10.  What's the point?
This is simply for the haul photo. I wanted them all together. I moved so they were all in boxes until now. This is not how I will end up having my manga once I get my new shelves in on Tuesday.   With that being said, I still won't have them organized alphabetically but rather on progress (in the process of reading if I have multiple volumes in a series and unread volumes in general) and ongoing (if the series is 100 percent out in English it will be put on it's own bookcase and if it's been read to completion). Oh and Language. I have several Japanese volumes and they will stick together.   Personally, I like organized chaos. 
Welcome to the fam bro
角栄の頃は色々「○ヵ年計画」とかあったから、良し悪しは別にして長期計画が立てられない訳でもないような…  よく社会主義国だと揶揄されてたけど。  只日本の場合諫早湾のとかもそうだけど、プロジェクトが動き出したら時勢にそぐわなくても止まらないからなぁ…  特別会計以外予算が年度をまたげないのが根元な気もする。
The best is when the warriors are losing and /r/nba gets filled with "X team just dropped 40 pts on the warriors in the 3rd quarter" etc. and they upvote the shit out of it, then lose :)  My favourite was the huge Spurs comeback in the regular season (2017?) 
Username checks out
Ugh... It's still Saturday... 
Yeah true. I will admit I got a bit excited. 
i found them for retail at a place near me about a week after the drop, just sitting! very lucky to have copped :") def look into other yellow shoes, the regular converse 1 stars in yellow are still heat
Love killing people who stream amd watch their reaction afterwards!
Lol totems aren't comparable to adrenaline, you can get into voice comms and time when to use adrenaline, you can't do shit with totems, it's 100% pure luck.
We will remember. 
Thanks -- I picked up a box of velocitors; I'll try them on Monday.
What if Sonny’s stuff is just _too_ good?
get a normie to hold up your brain after that post
https://streamable.com/07fdj
/r/hockeycirclejerk 
What kind of work do you do?
You can get a hotspot for $50 per month with plenty of data from Sprint.
Exactly! 
Is that typical or was it a complicated extraction? I've had three wisdom tooth removals and was not given anything. Just told to alternate paracetamol and ibuprofen when I got home. 
千葉でベトナムの女の子殺したやつは無罪主張してるというのに...
Yeah I took the issues people pointed out, and started solving them: why wouldn't you just bet to be last and stay last [well, what if that's everybody's goal too?].   You could technically bet to be first, and be first, that's gonna be worth more point than betting being last and arriving third, but that's still gonna be hard to do - because others are gonna try it too because they made the same bet, some are gonna want your place to Switch for the last position, all your powers are gonna be Slow down and you're gonna get hit by missiles, etc.  I think making the Race game backward and building mechanic around that, and THEN adding the Betting mechanic, really makes both concept really shine. 
I meant it as in when he showers it's being fed from the Platte. 
Correct. Any advances?
Sounds like banana - build absolutely nothing anywhere near anything.   If they hate pipelines so much are they shutting off the ones bring gas into their furnaces? 
That's 4 scoops, baby
Drinks were expensive and watered down last year on top of a 30 minutes wait in line.  Mostly it's dancing, DJs, and hanging out. The couches are comfy.  If you just want to drink they're doing a beer/saki garden this year for the first time. I'm betting it's going to be faster to get drinks at than lounge 21 unless they change things from last year's crunchyroll event.
Article also notes the Toronto numbers are skewed because of the one van attack that counts for a large portion of the murders this year. Overall I think the quote from the article sums it up nicely. 
Don't add the /s. If you want to be funny, be funny. Don't tell people you're being funny. Anyone who watched the cast will get the joke.
No idea. I imagine it would be using the 800Mhz band, but I'm not sure what speed they get. That said, I know in rural areas 4G is the preferred home connection on offer. Easier to implement than to run cables. 
All I know is people who are handsome and rich and popular are more happy than ugly loners, to take this conversation down to a layman level where I'm more comfortable. The reality is humans have basic needs and not meeting these needs has adverse effects on one's well-being.
Wrong forum
have been playing since day 1 regularly, level 37, still no unown. i doubt it
Man how I loved Supergirl S1 :( 
The section that I'm on here is just Northwest of decorah. We started in Kendallville and went towards Bluffton, this was right around chimney Rock
A lot of people did, it just took 60 years
Lying about what?
Run as fast and as far as you can. That behavior only escalates. Please be safe and take care of yourself. You do not deserve to be spoken to like that, ever. 
Gud Kitteh. 
Learn how to fully cook a fish first then maybe he'll be interested in seeing some of your pink meat you duckshit excuse for a fucking chef.
I've actually seen it marked red for parking on Trucker Path.  So...what, there were only ~400 parking spots at the time?
So the settings recommended when using a MKB. 🙂
Dude you're so wrong! Ughh!!! Such a jerk. Why don't you go tinker with your Nvidia control panel under color settings to improve the display of your dumb Lenovo monitor.  GOSH!
How are they gonna defeat VIRM and get home you ask? With the power of love, and they're gonna yeet the bomb at them, go home, Zero Two gets her body back, they have a huge feast and catch up, Zero Two and Hiro finish the picture book, then they make sweet dinosaur love.
O
Try having a go at probably the most fan edited film there is: Star Wars Episode I The Phantom Menace. There are tons of edits but try and find a way to make yours stand out. Or just pick something you are familiar with. Even if it is a film you love but one scene bothers you, or it's too long. Just go for it! 
Oh yeah I know
I don't think that's that ridiculous tbh...  We're talking about a guy who is already fringe starter level and only 24. There is not a single free agent in this entire class who is a better *fit* for the Suns' roster as it is currently constructed IMO. 
Yup
Ta mère la pute
Also, 'maxi scooters' these days can basically be just like bikes. The bmw 650 haulllllls butt.
I guess I’m one of the few who liked season two. My wife hated it.
You don't hate yourself yet, so continue cutting. 
"chuuu" = "you".  It's his cute way of saying "you", that's all, isn't it?
And France remain victorious despite his tantrum. 
Price
Country Roads, Take Me Home by John Denver (I'm not from West Virginia... I don't know why this song affects me so much)
I just mentioned to some people that the moniker Democratic Socialist is not a great choice. Many baby-boomers just hear the word socialist and their minds shutdown and they go into a blind rage against full socialism, communists, and East Germany style policies. To be fair East Germany had a lot of problems but they let it color everything about those terms and simply refuse to listen to reason and people explaining that that is not what Democratic Socialism is.  A better name would be Progressive Democrats or really anything similar.
Damn!
I just want to know which one they are. Trawling through several pictures trying to ID the cunt.
It makes me happy that another little you makes you happy. :)
Me too! Already stocked up on moisturizer and lip ointment :-)
Basil eggless mousse!   [https://www.seriouseats.com/recipes/2018/06/fresh-basil-mousse.html](https://www.seriouseats.com/recipes/2018/06/fresh-basil-mousse.html)
Cracker has evidence of being funny before the show, at least.
I'm just bored af, a little manic, and happy to find a new toy called askreddit.
Yeah streaming numbers are an achievement and all but he put out a 25 song album where 70% of the songs are ass so he doesn’t get too much cred
I would like it on one condition: it’s him hunting down order 66 survivors. And a bonus would be that the stormtroopers are still all or half clones with clone voices. 
Making the playoffs isn't winning, getting to the finals and winning 4 games is winning
I don’t get it 
It's most likely not malicious in the way that it won't steal your bank details but please please please don't use any registry cleaner application, windows uses the registry in a specific way to store information relating to system settings and background operations, registry cleaners look to removed entries they THINK are not in use, and in most cases remove useful entries, this isn't 1995, your registry won't magically fill up and break everything.  Look at hardware improvements or clearing out number of actively running programs to increase performance :) 
Albies
I agree completely-- I think it's more useful to learn to adapt recipes to your needs than to have to limit yourself to a narrow range of recipe sources. Swap butter for oil, yogurt for sour cream/mayo, milk for heavy cream; use less salt, oven roast instead of deep fry, skip the bacon, etc.   That being said, Bon Appetit, Food&amp;Wine, Food Wishes/Allrecipes, and New York Times are some of my most reliable, go-to sources of inspiration, but I'll also browse other sites like Food Network. If I have a specific dish in mind, I'll almost always just google it and browse the top hits to see what seems best and most practical for me. These are all American, but I like that they have a huge diversity of cuisines and tend to be educational in addition to just listing recipes, which is a huge part of enhancing your skill as a cook. 
r/animalswithoutnecks
how about a more reasonable game?
I would add if I may - anyone who believes the govt has the ability currently to  defeat the citizenry is in serious predicament.   Why? They will do as they're told regardless of any personal, moral or religious conviction out of fear.   They must always consider an uprising from the citizenry as a possibility for this experimental form of govt to work. 
That might be me 😂 I logged in yesterday to check the prices on fallout 1 and 2
The Chads of the world can try to take Veronica, but when the GAMES RISE UP they will all be sorry.   B O T T O M T E X T
They will have all the power they want over on r/Cars2fanpage 
for sure 
http://youtu.be/Pq4IxsLke4k  at 0:31, I don't have that food processor, is there an alternate for that?  Thanks by the way!!
/r/burtcoin
Seeing the comments on posts like these are why I don't post drone photos here. If I were to follow Canadian drown laws exactly, even though I live in a semi-rural area compared to OPs pic, I wouldn't be allowed to fly my drone anywhere within a 30 minute drive of my place. Fuck that shit, there is *no way in hell an actual aircraft is gonna be flying &lt;100ft above my area unless it's about to crash*. Drone laws are too strict. I'm not gonna be calling up the Canadian air whatever and get approval every time I want to go outside and have a bit of fun.  Btw, great pic OP!
Could you elaborate?
Wait? They want to ban contraception? To what extent? Birth control? Or condoms? Or what?
Except when something in 2.0 is busted because they didn't address it in 1.0, now they gotta do 2.5 because they cant go back and directly address shit in 1.0 because 2.0 is essentially additional spaghetti code with duct tape weaved into 1.0, issues and all.  Not addressing whats in front of you just adds additional points of failure should you expand on functionality.
delete
...his remaining hand
I think the fact that a man in a coma would have a chance to become concious separates him from plants. Remember that eating the body of a person who died naturally is vegan, though I wouldn’t recommend it.
Not so much, but the land *doesn't move right* when you get off the boat sometimes.  It's a little surreal.
2006?
Oh shit, red knight is coming back 100%
It's the only way to enjoy that disgusting stuff bavarians call beer though.
I haaaate how they stand off to the side of the TV while watching movies or playing video games. 
My dog was barking at the door like she wanted to go out. When I got up to open the door, she ran over to the couch and punked my spot. 
Thank you!
**Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.**   ___  ### LFG/Recruitment  We understand the desire to use the subreddit to find groups and advertise your discord and other communities.    The best place to find a group is on Discord in the official Fortnite server: https://discord.gg/fortnite ___  [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
Box Cutter 
Data from [https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List\_of\_United\_Kingdom\_locations:\_Tr-Tre](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_United_Kingdom_locations:_Tr-Tre)  Created in excel
Don't we shoot tons of rockets in the military every day? What are the significant differences between military rockets carrying munitions payloads and rockets being launched into orbit? 
Hold up. We can all agree it's not "St Petes" though, right?
/r/cursedimages 
maybe the discount luck will shine on us
Which policy?
Yeah, I know, I wasn’t seriously considering the Mazda 6.  My next car will be smaller and much faster. 
Damn. It's best just to go sleep then. It's 1am right now here
He's got that Klan-do attitude. 
Holy fuck I just discovered a whole new world. I didn't know videos could look like this. Thank you so much.  Here's the instructions for those of you curious:  https://www.svp-team.com/wiki/SVP:MPC-HC  Just download and install SVP 4, MPC-HC, and ffdshow beforehand.   Edit: My god, watching the latest episode of SAO right now, the fight scene looks INSANE with this setup. Sure my computer is slow as shit while SVP is active but wow.
Good story!  I don't think I could let myself do it so publicly.  I'd be a bit afraid of winding up on a list I'd rather not be a part of.  Thanks for sharing though, it was hot!  The closest I have are times when I was younger and pretty sure I was alone out on the water/in the water that I serviced myself.  There were a couple of times as a teenager that I was horny at the community pool and when everyone left, I wanked in this gated off area that housed the pool's main filter, or in the restroom.  Also, there was a time I attended a wedding and I was staying at a friend's house.  I think I was the only one not hooking up that night and there were all kinds of moans and sexy noises in the air, so I settled for rubbing one out in the bathroom.
This is my favorite video game of all time. Makes me want to drink code red Mountain Dew and eat Combos. I’ve still never gotten the thirty jumps by myself, I always have to have my brothers do it for me. 
https://snew.github.io/r/The_Donald/comments/82ejdd/obama_we_are_running_out_of_oilmust_switch_to/dv9gj7g/?st=jj22iq00&amp;sh=83fb9a75  Here's one.  Sorry for the goofy link, it's an archived version since the joke about lynching the president was deleted.  There are plenty more if you care to look, but we both know you don't.
This thread was crossposted from https://www.reddit.com/r/Ice_Poseidon/comments/8v61qk made by /u/BodyDoubles. To mute xpost notifications, send a PM.
 I’m from Uruguay.  Forlán is such a God. 2010 was such a fun cup to watch him in.
Wow. What an excellent video. Gorgeously shot and edited.  Loved the honesty in how you talked about the ups and downs.
Not sure what you’re singing, but I’d like to dance to it with you regardless 
Very true!
*yawn*  That must be why they forced it through congress with no reading, right? Because they campaigned so hard on it they had all that popular support.   And it certainly didn’t generate enough backlash that they handed the Republicans a majority in the House immediately afterwards.   Oh, wait...
"Our house, in the middle of our street, faggot."   There you go.
That’s what I love about em. Gotta tune em properly. Otherwise they sound like shit lol  We use a couple programs, some pre &amp; post EQ and I dial it consistently through the show with a wireless laptop in the crowd.   I love heading the center of the crowd and feeling the energy and fine tuning when I need to. It’s also a great conversation starter because when do you see a laptop in the middle of an underground rave lol
Right.. or we can just kill these psychos before they hurt people. If you meet these demons in real life, you'd know it's inevitable they'll hurt innocents
Apollo has been outperform Zven for a while now.
Tamamo doesn’t have a dodge, sorry; you can’t use that skill ;)
Direct camera shot it was constantly pulsing/moving uae to focus 
Same haha   Not a boy but I’ve been around them
Can we please get this to be the top post of all time on the subreddit 
He's so petty. He will bitch and moan then call Greek fat.  That's his hole content 
I did catch that part. Agree.  Ok.  We’re all on edge and bitter.  
If you’re keeping the car for 10 years, then, no issue with it. I’m sure it’s a nice car anyway.   Something fundamentally needs to change. You’re unfortunately in one of the hardest places in the US to make things work on a less than six figure income. So either income or location.   I’d say the house purchase wouldn’t be approved anyway so that’s out for now. Wish you luck!
If he hasn't decided yet, I'd say it's pretty likely he's hitting free agency.
E
The hot spot functionality is a feature of the phone itself. As long as u have a 4g data connection then you can share that connection via hot-spot to ur pc
She was living in a halfway house too. At 16, what type of unfortunate life must she have had that she was living in a halfway house and dating a 30 something year old bloke.   And where are her parents? I've only heard from the sister.  Such a tragic life ended :(
I kind of like the idea of a powerful box and a streaming box, if they can get the streaming component down tight
Battle hound!!
It's not impossible at all. They allow anything hiphop related there. Why would you want it not allowed there? Why should we let dumb shit like [this](https://i.imgur.com/CKZeupd.jpg) hit the front page?
Was it confirmed that Halo Infinite is on Installation 07? Don't remember 343i saying that.
Here's a thought, don't have sex with your girlfriend's mom. 
Mah hart. Mah sole. 
According to this [wikihow article](https://www.wikihow.com/Become-a-Grandmaster), you get a FIDE membership, complete 3 high level finishes at FIDE tournaments, and reach a rating of 2500 through these tournaments. 
kbird blows Zangna away.  Not even close.  kbird is only open during the week for lunch and dinner.
There's a code in this message.  Someone take all the capital letters and arrange them to form a statement.  Perhaps I'm wrong.  Look at the second page.
LV - WEAPON (POKLYPZ REMIX) 
r/karmacourt
Every time I think about how we could have had Verlander instead of Gray, I feel pain.
Yes to all of this. 
I'm talking about Old old Bladestorm
Mh, possible
Is that the TRS-80 PC2? I think that's a rebadged Sharp PC-1500.
Nah..after the 47th time maybe
He wants to be a starter. He's not worth starter money and is a cancer to the team if he's forced to be a bench player. Not worth it imo 
What obvious reason? Not so obvious to me it would seem lol 
No eipä tänne ketään halutakkaan, jota Pride haittaa.
That's too much dodging for one man - first you got to dodge assire'd cards and now chinese dudes as well? Something is wrong...
When you repost 
Too soon bro too soon
;-; 100 degrees Fahrenheit, or about 38 Degrees Celsius   But this heat does make me wish I were dead^^^^more.than.usual
Rusty again!  Battlehound too... no new skins on a weekend? Interesting
Treat her as you wish to be treated. 
Indeed.
I want to know if anyone happened to be watching from that spot in Anarchy and ended up getting smoked by that first stage thruster when it crashed down. 
To clarify these were during an appropriate time. This one was at the end of the Homily before the Liturgy of the Eucharist. Also it was the pastor not the priest offering the mass. 
It only applies on damage dealt while the target is CC'd, not including the CC'ing ability.  Aatrox has virtually no way to proc it.  (He could auto someone while his W is yanking them back, technically.)
Either "milk of be milked" or what?
I'm a woman and I don't even know if it's true but still made me laugh
Not if it's deserved...
Maybe. But she messaged me first. 
TRA's let this male side show right through. Women know these men are not women.
Of course it was a small, probably geeky pixiegirl that get moist when an overweight unwashed dudes that subscribes to r/clopclop walks in, that was behind the counter.
Never forget [1178](https://sv.wikipedia.org/wiki/J%C3%A4mtlands_historia#Norgetiden), though!
sucks for the test subjects that were not immune to HIV
As far as Roy Ayers goes, I recommend the album "Come Into Knowledge" by RAMP (Roy Ayers Music Project) and his album Everybody Loves The Sunshine. Also try out The Aura Will Prevail by George Duke and Baduizm by Erykah Badu. 
I had in mind that this would be an exclusive skin given to community creators whose designs were added to the game. The ones I know of are: u/CYTOFOX (Omen) u/tursuboi (Tomato Head) u/Wylp (Dusty Detective) u/RexSadio (Robbers)  Add others if you know
It has to be at least 50% food by law /s
Kaitlyn (standing in a bikini in front of 2 very hot dudes)...  "Omg I'm  soooooyahhh faaattt"
If you're someone who follows the laws and rules, don't start breaking them to look cool. Tell her the truth about your driver's license. 
Probably Augies lmao
I am the very beginning of millenials. Thanks for all the excellent points, I wanted to add a few things. On top of the recession; we faced 9/11 and terrorism, mass incarceration, war on drugs, school shootings, police shootings, corporations being ppl, climate change, stagnant wages, increased costs in living, increased medical costs, social media development, and we have been fighting a war, a brutal real war for the last 17 years. Then our parents are like God when I was ur age...., Thats what is wrong with kids today, so spoiled. Then they say I remember when gas was $.25 a gallon or I remember when I worked a part time job to pay for my college. When I respond, I worked 2 part times and no way I could pay for college with that. They respond your just not doing it right, not responsible enough. I watched a lot of my peers turn to drugs and just give up.  
S
Yes, not so much that it gets better as you get deeply into it.  I did the same but came back and it’s now my favourite show ever.
oh my goodness, you're going to make me cry with that story :'(
**Off-Topic Discussion**: All top-level comments must be a story or poem. Reply here for other comments.  #####Reminder for Writers and Readers: * Prompts are meant to inspire new writing.  Responses don't have to fulfill every detail.  * Please remember to [be civil](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/rules#wiki_rule_10.3A_be_civil) in any feedback.  ---  [](#icon-help)[^(What Is This?)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/off_topic) [](#icon-information)[^(First Time Here?)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/user_guide) [](#icon-exclamation)[^(Special Announcements)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/announcements) [](#icon-comments)[^(Click For Our Chatrooms)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/chat)
&gt;tool  &gt;fuyuhiko
This is actually a great wrestling promo. I wonder what the rat kings finisher would be?  Neck thought chop? 
Makes sense. Thanks for the explanation. I guess some people do think everything through 
it's like eh by death grips but more traditional hip hop with a beat and a flow and shit
Frame her son.
Listen... This aint Guinness! This is more Diageo nonsense. Guinness isn't Guinness anymore 
我希望他们下地狱
Anyone got a link?
Am I getting a connotation being implied here...?
As a reminder, the comment rules are listed in the sidebar. You are responsible for following the rules!  If you see a comment or post that breaks the rules, please report it to the moderators. This helps keep the subreddit clear of rule-breaking content.  If this post is not bullshit and needs an explanation of why it's not bullshit, report the post and reply to this comment with your explanation (which helps us find it quickly).  #And of course, if you're here from /r/all or /r/popular, **don't forget to subscribe to /r/QuitYourBullshit!**   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/quityourbullshit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wedding is in late September but might as well be summer as it will still be hot in Texas
Yeah I do agree, just this is the first time I have ever heard a successful story with these medications. Everyone I've seen just seems to burn down in flames. Thank you for coming at me in a civil manner, and sorry you had to see that heated argument. I think they may of affected me badly also because I was 16? Not to sure
she told ika and ross she had a bf in her interviews so she was definitely with him before she went into sequester
Probably said polytheistic because cent and glad are pagan
L
Remind me, how much cash do we blow on Gray?
No  oblivion wtf
I have no idea how that autocorrected to woks.  I meant mags.  Or epms
The US has never been allies with Canada. We are, however, quite friendly with your Saxe-Coburg overlords.
It does though. Boombayah is the song with the hardest dance *and* the only song that's half rap. They could have done any of the other songs, it would have been a struggle but it would have been possible Boombayah is straight up impossible for them to pull off and the leader of team 1 must have known that. Short Hair and Like Ooh Aah only has a short rap and a simple enough dance, Very Very Very doesn't even really have rap, Mamma Mia's dance is energetic but nothing like Boombayah and at least it's Japanese, and the Japanese song is honestly easy as hell compared to the rest. 
That's right, I just wanted to clarify.
I will feel embarrassed as a european if we are the only region to fail.
!invest 203
no irony like getting nailed in the balls while trying to impress a girl.
That a stock must "fill the gap" is the most annoying TA belief I've heard.
Why are you like this.
Bkshare 
Maybe not enough good all-stars agreeing to returning?
VirtualDub2 http://virtualdub2.com  XviD4PSP https://winnydows.com/en/
Worth noting that not all PEDs are steroids.  Eg human growth hormone is not a steroid, but is a performance enhancing drug.  So someone who states that aren’t on steroids might be taking something else.
Nice shifting of the goal posts bub.  You were going on ad nauseum about employees vs customers.   Nothing else had to be said short of Op chiming in, but you opted to take issue with something that YOU didn't understand.  Everyone else understood exactly what was being said. 
Hope he feels like that Pussy Yu Darvish and feels the hate that he's gonna have for leveraging us for ratings. The bitch.
Woooooooo boy you bet your ass I would. Done with the late nights, no weekends off, shitty pay, shitty equipment, narcissistic psychopaths for bosses, crackheads for coworkers, the heat, the cuts, the burns, no benefits, no vacations, etc etc etc. I’ll even take shitty pay if I could have the rest.
I keep looking at my phone and squinting and I cant see it.  Should I unlock it?
This isnt /r/nba
&gt;Hilary and Obama have actually been in Gitmo for months -- their public appearances done by actors  That's some next level stupid.
Lol. Thankfully that spoiler is almost ten years old, but you never know who just started watching.
He’s Wild Bill Hagy, the late Dundalk cab driver and instigator of the Roar From 34 at old Memorial Stadium. The O in the anthem? Him. The cheer where you spell out ORIOLES while contorting your body appropriately? Him.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cVoSYXQ1EEM  He stopped going to Memorial Stadium when they stopped letting you bring booze. He threw his cooler out on the field and walked. He did come out of retirement a couple times, most notably for Cal’s induction into the HOF. After he passed, the Orioles had a night where they handed out HAGY 34 shirseys. A couple years ago, they gave away Hagy-style straw hats, and I believe they still sell ones just like it.
TEAM RUSTY
Get rid of most of the people. Rewrite history so no one remembers what happened.  Build giant pyriamids and statues of u/Bigpiganddig 
The Flores Act amendment addresses this and specifically mentioned there is no intention on forcing adults to be no longer detained while awaiting their asylum decision.
Oh thank God, I think you're right. I looked up weevil and it seems very similar to a few types.   I don't actually have a ton of perishable in my cabinets, but I'll pull everything out and scrub them tomorrow.   Do you think I need to throw out everything in my cabinets (besides things like canned goods), or do you think I'll be able to tell if something's bad?
June 2015 Form 73C
No problem.  I am sitting and watching tangled with my daughter so anything to not have to watch the actual movie lol.
You sound like one of them
After throne wars in December I had 11 chances with 500 gems, and had one 5*, plus a bunch of other 3* and 4* relics... now with the "re-release" I've had 7 or 8 pulls, with one 5* and a bunch of 2* and 3* XP relics.  I've seen some that had 3 or 4 5* relics after throne wars...
South Carolina is better than Clemson, yes!
A roachcam in the house transmitting live as the flames drew in would have been interesting!
All i need is 50m not 200m
Good job skeleton your perseverance will take you far
Thor sad!
Okay, I'm online right now. Thanks a lot for the help.
Same, my uncle's camper has this design and it takes like 30 seconds to do.
The Cycle repeats itself then.
Where did the pink inflatable dildo go?
Hahaha yeah that’s one way of looking at it. 
I think that last paragraph is just a weeeee bit hyperbolic 
I think it was just that I was in a really small town. Tackle wasn't available until high school. 
Were and was I guess
You can thank the 2001 school yard for that one.
Nani??
This year is so unlike the last few years that it really all does feel like a lifetime ago. 
&gt;OKC right now is a better team than the Lakers.   Im sorry, did you just forget that LeBron is coming?  Cause if you didn't, then idk what you're smoking if you think the Lakers + LBJ arent better than the Thunder
Tea tree oil + less washing works for me.
One for each gender, and each term of the Trump presidency!
As a general rule, murder is premeditated.  Manslaughter can be voluntary or involuntary. Voluntary manslaughter includes things like crimes of passion and deminished responsibility. Involuntary manslaughter is unintentional - think death by dangerous driving.
Yeah, exactly! Also that’s an excellent username!
The Soulsborne games are some of my favorite of all time! I’ve plat every single one save for Demon’s Souls :) It’s pretty much the same feeling here although I’d say it’s a big heightened since MonHun can feel a bit more immersive than the Soulsborne games at times haha
i mean, maybe silver league players are  but mutas suck in high tier play  if someone scouts that you’re massing mutas, it’s not very hard to counter.
How do know that your dreams are not actually real-life and your waking-life is the actual dreams?
[](/user/genericdrummer)Your submission has been automatically removed because titles must begin with "PsBattle: ". This needs to be exact.   Please refer to the [Submission rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/photoshopbattles/wiki/submissionrules) as to why this is the case and check to see that any other rules are satisfied if you choose to resubmit.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/photoshopbattles) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Quite wrong. Your statement evinces obvious displays of emotion. The words you chose make that clear. My post shows no emotional attachment to firearms whatsoever.  In fact it's not even about me and firearms. It is about the fact that the necessity of a free people to be armed was enshrined in the Constitution, as a foundational value to this system. I happen to believe it's there for a reason, and I believe that the amount of deaths that actually occur are acceptable within the framework of freedom and rights inherent to being an American. If I were to believe, as many do because of outright lies by the media, that gun violence was an order of magnitude higher than it actually is, I might not feel that way.   Expecting that only soldiers pay the price for freedom is rather like leaving it to the hired help.   We make the calculation that a certain amount of suffering will happen with freedoms all the way down the line, from freedom of speech to freedom of Association to freedom from unreasonable search and seizure. Put plainly, all of those things may very well have a body count attached.  This is no different. 
They’re both super thirsty for each other 
Jesus christ stop doing the "thing attacking thing with thing". Not a new meme and it's starting to piss me off. That said old cartoon memes may be making a rise.
Basically me as scotland
This is an embarassingly ignorant comment.  Migrants from the EU have been a [net benefit](http://money.cnn.com/2017/09/06/news/economy/immigration-uk-economy-brexit/index.html) to the UK:  &gt;According to a 2016 study by University College London, immigrants who arrived from the EU after 2000 contributed £1.34 to the U.K. economy for every £1 they took out.  The same is true for the US. Immigrants contribute more to the economy and commit crimes at lower rates than the population at large.  The UK shot itself in the foot by cutting off a flow of healthy working-age individuals that were a benefit to the economy. If you're saying the opposite you either don't have a clue what you're talking about, you're speaking from bigotry and willful ignorance, or you're typing away in St Petersburg getting paid for this.
Hahahaha
My point is where are all the other guys who are too 20 in the league can’t tell me they don’t influence their teams like Kyle O’Quinn/Seth Curry
But a damaged Mercedes is usually better than a healthy Haas. Haas finding  a bit of time racing Mercedes was the point, not the Mercedes pace.
Eliza hugs him back happily as well.  "What do you want to do now master? Is there anything you want to play?"
I finally finished "The Empire must Die" a book about the final years of the Russian empire. Honestly, I'm just trying to get back into reading and listening to books on a regular basis, so finishing feels good. This book was good though, it used diaries, news articles, and other first hand accounts from the time to paint a picture of the collapse of the empire.
Your physicality doesn't define you or give you purpose. Visit a local church and talk to someone (talk to me to). We can tell you all about purpose. 
If you don't mind 2D, check out Star Traders: Frontiers.
That doesn't really roll off the tongue. 
Less jealousy, more so dislike of inefficiency 
Your right, who eats turtles?
Hmmm
They cop the loss. The guy who cleaned her house said one time a group of thugs trashed a house between the time he left and the agent inspected - Jim's took responsibility. Doesn't sound great to us but they've probably put a lot of thought into their strategy 
I know what your saying.  It’s frankly the name... not the quality.  Hope you find a bike that works for you in whatever meaning that is.  If your down in Melbourne sometime, look me up - love to show you around!
Thank you for the link!
DeAndre Jordan to Lakers confirmed.
He just put the wrong episode number.
I get the feeling it's probably better in it's native language.
Will you guys just read a book or something. I can't believe how stupid you're allowing yourself to look. Work to adopt a nuanced view of the world, my **comrade.**
Quick! Prep the burn ward!
Fuck off dude.
First of all, good taste!Second of all, I am NOT an expert but I do have a guess. Musashi wrote a book towards the end of his life, "The Book of Five Rings," It's broken into sections. The Book of Earth, The Book of Water, The Book of Fire, The Book of Wind, and The Book of the Void. Earth is an introduction, Water is about his Ni-ten ichi-ryu style, Fire is about timing in combat, Wind is about the failings of contemporary schools of fighting, finally Void is the epilogue and a description of his ideas on consciousness and mindset.  My guess is that the "Fifth Form" name is meant to invoke the Fifth Book, although I suppose it would make more sense if it was called "Second Form".
I was simply paraphrasing the CBA's letter.  Let's put it another way. The CHRA and hate crimes section of the Criminal Code already reference classes of people based on sexual orientation, gender, religious belief, race, disability, etc. All C-16 does is add a category for transgender people.   Refusing to use preferred pronouns is comparable to using gay/gendered/religious/racial slurs. People don't go to jail for slurs unless they are promoting or committing violent acts along with using those slurs. 
If you're too close with a kick, you'll automatically throw a knee or body kick depending on the range.
The Kool aid
*Jesus appears and high fives you*
But why
GO FUCK YOURSELF YOU FUGGIN SCAB BASTARD!
corn is mega very big haha to me
Yes do it! Also flushing baby wipes can really hurt your plumbing and end up costing you thousands in repairs. Yes, even the flushable kind
Disgusting.  Check her dating site inbox for all the "nice guys" she can't be bothered to respond to.  Stupid entitled cunt.
Yes 
how do i count
&gt;Just how cucked are the mods?  &gt;No really, take a look at the comments, these people are very clearly actually handicapped in some way. They shouldn't have financial independence.  &gt;Please go back to whatever SJW hellhole you crawled out of.  &gt;It's not an attack on gay people, it's an attack on sick fucks.  &gt;Not letting South Korea go to the Ching Chang Chongs?  &gt;You tumblrettes are precisely the problem with online discourse.   &gt; if every country was an American puppet, well, that would be fine by me.  &gt;What's with this trend of pussy-ass mods who can't take a joke?  Wow, such "hot takes". Did it ever occur to you that maybe you're getting banned for the way you're presenting your opinions, and not because mods are anti-free speech?
Because it's not nearly as profitable.  Oil is extremely profitable because they can corner the market on a rare commodity.  You can't corner the market on renewables, which means that it's unlikely that they - or anyone else - is ever going to earn much money from them.
The majority of my boys come from Southeast Cichlids.
haha just give the songs a listen is all I ask :)
Not from a jedi...
That's our thing. 
she has a long face, wont fuck
You mean the field/deer combo?  Which one comes with the cheap scope like you mentioned?
View the full modlist. They're the one that's been mod the longest. Make sure you have screenshots and any other evidence. ESPECIALLY of the mod accusing you of hacking. Make sure the first thing you say is that you got banned because another mod re approved your post. That should not happen. Ever.
I think it’s clear that happy DR characters are the best fan art.
The problem is shops dont sell anything because supplies are limited and overpriced.
Sorry, I'm not a battery expert.  As for your citation, in 2015 it was 263 million which is close enough to 300 million especially considering the light duty and combination vehicles will require more battery.  As for not answering me anymore, fine with me.  The numbers are so great it doesn't diminsh the valid question I brought up.  What do we do with the waste?  It's a massive amount of waste.  What are we going to do with it?
Alex also asked him what he wanted, Diogenes replied. "Get out of my sun"
10/10 would consume ravenously
I really don't give a shit what you have to say.
Finest
Have four hundred upvotes!
Definitely a top 2 reigning queen look, alongside Violet Chachki
IT HAS BEEN GIBBEN
Like dragging peanut butter through shag carpet
OP, you wanna tell us something?
Or Streamline + 37 keys
K
D'aww. Any opinions you may have on the ship aside, this is really sweet.
do you think he might ever make a return to the sport?
Looking at season zero of the anime and the manga pre duel monsters Joey is very capable at beating an armed opponent, even an armed martial artist, with just his fists/wits (and sometimes a soda can).   Joey could easily beat marik in a fight if Marik is armed with anything less then a gun.
I initially read this as "Robots" and it *still* made sense.  FML
Exactly this.   The extremists say everyone is either a nazi/commie, or a nazi sympathizer or commie sympathizer.  I really think the entire /r/ENLIGHTENEDCENTRISM mock-meme is bizarre.  
And all the conservative justices at the time except Kennedy. 
Fuck both holes!
Hey, really late here lol but I wanna ask can/do you manifest multiple things this way? Like can you attract 3 things at once or just 1? Thanks
Damn.
Idk   I founded it
Dude cider hangovers are the worst. Don't do this to yourself.
Happy cake day!
I get what you're saying but fantasy still requires internal consistancy.
Couldn't agree more mate.   You don't give snow-shoes to someone buried in an avalanche. Give your girlfriend a hug from us all. 
In the 90s there was a JLA vs Avengers cross over. They fought twice. Superman won one and lost one. He did lift the hammer but almost immediately after it was explained odin let him because of the circumstance
OUR BOY RUSTY!!!
Have an upvote
yr opinion, not quite related to the picture
#Welcome to r/LateStageCapitalism ***  #***Please remember that this subreddit is a SAFE SPACE for socialist discussion. Any liberalism, capitalist apologia, anti-socialism, gun-prohibition campaigning, or attempts to debate socialism will be met with an immediate ban. Bigotry, [ableism](http://www.autistichoya.com/p/ableist-words-and-terms-to-avoid.html), and hate speech will also be met with immediate bans. See our sidebar for the full rules. Looking for debate? Try r/DebateCommunism.***  If you are still unsure what content is allowed on LSC, see [What LSC is and is not](https://www.reddit.com/r/LateStageCapitalism/comments/8qojst/what_lsc_is_and_is_not_for_those_visiting_from/).  If you are new to socialism, please check out our [Socialism Crash Course](https://github.com/dessalines/essays/blob/master/crash_course_socialism.md), and our [Socialism FAQ](https://github.com/dessalines/essays/blob/master/socialism_faq.md).  If you are curious as to what our leftist terminology means, then please check out our [Glossary of Socialist Terms](https://github.com/dessalines/essays/blob/master/glossary_of_socialist_terms.md).  In addition, here are some introductory links about socialism:  - [Albert Einstein - *Why Socialism?*](http://monthlyreview.org/2009/05/01/why-socialism/)  - [Pyotr Kropotkin - *The Conquest of Bread*](https://theanarchistlibrary.org/library/petr-kropotkin-the-conquest-of-bread)  - [Friedrich Engels - *The Principles of Communism*](https://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1847/11/prin-com.htm)  - [Vladimir Lenin - *The State &amp; Revolution*](https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/staterev/)  - [Rosa Luxemburg - *Reform or Revolution*](https://www.marxists.org/archive/luxemburg/1900/reform-revolution/)  - [Karl Marx &amp; Friedrich Engels - *The Communist Manifesto*](https://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1848/communist-manifesto/)  For an extended list of works, check out [our wiki](https://www.reddit.com/r/LateStageCapitalism/wiki/index) or [this masterlist.](http://pastebin.com/raw/7xNqzd85)  #Ⓐ☭Ⓐ☭Ⓐ☭  ***   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/LateStageCapitalism) if you have any questions or concerns.*
These might not be the most intelligent things I’ve *ever* witnessed an animal do, but I would like to just shout out to chickens and say that they are *not* dumb animals.  1.  My chickens know that I will go outside almost every time I hear them freaking out, making their distressed calls.  So they started to figure out. If it was getting a bit late in the morning and they hadn’t eaten, that they should start yelling for no reason to get me outside.  Once I’d come out, every single one would run up to me as if I had their food ready. 2.  One of my hens figured out there was a crack in the bottom of my feed bucket.  She figured this out pretty quick when she saw a pellet or two fall.  So she will peck at the tape I put in there to fix it and pull it down to spill out the food.  I’m cheap so now I just hold up the bucket super high whenever I go out to feed everyone.  3. I’ve also had some chickens duck down into tall grass if I’m trying to round them up and can’t for the life of me find the ones that do this.  And they will *not* come out.  Three days later they show up like, “Yeah, you will never know my secrets.”  In general, they also tend to ‘complain’ if a water dish is low/empty or want food.  It’s this annoyed drawn out voice.  Just like a dog or cat would do as most can relate to.  Just wanted to eliminate some bias here about chickens.  That is all!
Link
Could you imagine a Shaq-Kobe-Duncan squad though? All the rings. 
Go to all the openings of the galleries you're interested in, and you can gradually get to know who the owners are and what the scene is like.  It requires networking like any other business.  Pay attention to what they're selling, what they put in art fairs, how many artists they have vs. the frequency of shows, etc.  You should know everything about a gallery before you approach them.  As a gallery owner, I disagree that artists should have 100 rejections.  You should really be much more selective than that.  Time is better spent on quality connections than quantity.  Even with a "no unsolicited submissions" message, galleries still get annoying emails from artists who have nothing to do with the gallery's program.
Nice.
He's dun goofed
The a7ii is a great full frame camera. I bought a 6500 for video, but love the dynamic range on raw stills from the a7ii.
**Attention! [Serious] Tag Notice**  * Jokes, puns, and off-topic comments are not permitted in **any** comment, parent or child.  * Parent comments that aren't from the target group will be removed, along with their child replies.   * Report comments that violate these rules.  Posts that have few relevant answers within the first hour, and posts that are not appropriate for the [Serious] tag will be removed. Consider doing an AMA request instead.  Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Preach AJ. PREACH
Idk how he dominated us as an A but cant pitch at home 
Art house horror films are always divisive. The people who hate it typically want something like The Purge 9 or Unfriended: Spooky Sequel.
I've gotten the warlock weapon twice while trying to get the hunter one :/
Until you get to a certain number it does that I can't remember how many it is.
The latest one I played: Monster Hunter world!
Sauron* and yeah it’s probably because that’s what the ring did in the hobbit and it helped the story and he couldn’t just stop having it make the person invisible in LOTRs
You know the items for tomorrow?
Many thanks fellow traveler
**Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.**   ___  ### LFG/Recruitment  We understand the desire to use the subreddit to find groups and advertise your discord and other communities.    The best place to find a group is on Discord in the official Fortnite server: https://discord.gg/fortnite ___  [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
Well dang how many ppl have you had come in with that issue?
Did anyone catch what the voice said?
good one bro
That is kind of a big ask.  Keep it more on the down low.
Literally what I wrote in the post
I think they were just turned back to normal. Most of the time people only notice the bad RNG. I know I do that sometimes.
Everyone jumping on Cody that he didn't smite while Ryu is doing jack shit in the pit with his ult up. 
Fortnite is free so i would go with that. If you like it, good, stick with it. If you don’t, at least you didn’t waste any money and you have an alternative. So i would say to try fortnite first to reduce the risk of losing money.  Edit: never mind, both are free. Just download and do one match in each. Pick the one that gave you the best experience.
I wonder if they have any in van. Seattle only has one that I know of. Used to be homies with them so played a bunch there for free cuz I didn't bring my desktop to school. Miss the cheap ass PC bangs in Asia tho.
Yeah that did.  Also gave me like 6 salien outfit pieces.
I am in the same shoes, prob need join other association since we forget our association information. 
Fight club had sonething similar to this too...
Dude's got otherworldly length and is already more filled out and a better basketball player than his dad ever was. Don't see how he wouldn't go top 5.
well, at least you have a bicycle.
Blackmon deserves a bench from next week
Is that yankee stadium or Fenway park
You should also realize while the whole Sex offender was going on - he was also being attacked because people felt he was racist for the promo about trashing japanese wrestlers.   So he was saying that to that person - then moved to the sex offender apollogy
It's too bad she won't live, but then again who does?
/u/xotroyy, This appears to be part of a playlist and it's not fair to those who follow the rules for you to request feedback on multiple items. **Repeatedly requesting feedback on more than one song can lead to a permanent ban.**  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/makinghiphop) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Just got through Bayleigh and Kaycee's yoga lesson and it was probably my feeds moment of the day. They're two of my most likable houseguests on either side, so it was nice to see them bonding and laughing. Y'all are haters.
Haha I always warn people that iguanas are super hard to care for! But with your experience, you should be fine. Just do your homework!
Good thing they put a picture of the kitten instead of a mugshot.
Consult lalo na kung may other symptoms na nararamdaman.
thats for damn sure! houston is a swamp year round
It's technique. I believe from his position it was one the only way he could kick it in, so he choose it because of that and not just to be fancy. He couldn't hit it flat on and hit the target, unless he was on the side of the ball, but for that he'd also be on the path of the ball.  &gt; Then again I heard that in soccer you’re not suppose to kick the ball straight or you might injure your toes?!  Only if you're barefooted and it's a tough ball. The reason you rarely see a player doing it is because it's easier to miss the target if you try that, as any minor error makes the ball go way off.
Got to get your best suit ready for Magic.
Fast af boi
&gt; (velcro sucks for dog owners)  And how! I think the next time I redo my chain I'll zip 'em to the board instead, thanks for the idea! :)
My dad finally taught me how to use the grill  We did a reverse sear and everything 
F
Yeah, I've been focusing on writing about Lautar who has so far reached Albert's land and will now go down to Callum and Tam.
Leksah is 5.3GB including its dependencies like Gtk+ and ghc etc.  ([here](https://gist.github.com/hamishmack/54c8c3d0f842ffdb3a7e00dbd4f98e69) is a breakdown).  On top of that Leksah builds metadata and downloads the source for packages into `~/.leksah-0.17` and it is not unusual for that directory to go over 1GB (mine is 1.9 right now).  Even if Leksah is too big, I still think you might want to try Nix. Many open source projects seem to be better supported on Nix than anywhere else (not just Leksah). For instance running `nix-env -i inkscape` works and often seems to install a newer version than is available in `dmg` form.  Nix has binary caches of everything including all the Haskell packages. This is great if the machine your using it slow (no waiting for builds).  Unfortunately this is not true of Leksah on macOS right now (The atk C library in the nix cache does not work with haskell-gi on macOS, so if you do install Leksah it will take hours to build on a MacBook Air).  I use don't recommend using stack with nix.  Stack's raison d'être is to address issues nix solves better.  Instead I recommend using Nix with `cabal new-build` (and `cabal new-repl` etc.) as they work nicely with Nix installed haskell packages.  If you have a large `~/.stack` directory or lots of bid `.stack-work` directories lying around you might be able to reclaim some space there.  Similarly if you have installed GHC by itself you might get a lot of space back once you are happy with Nix by uninstalling ghc and clearing out `~/.ghc`, `~/.cabal` and `~/Library/Haskell` (check in `~/.cabal/bin` and `~/Library/Haskell/bin` in case you have something you `cabal installed` that you need to `nix-env -i`).  To uninstall a nix packages run `nix-env -e leksah-ghc843` then run `nix-collect-garbage -d` to GC stuff you are not using.  If you try Nix and it all goes horribly wrong the best uninstall process is to run the Nix installer again.  It will complain that Nix is already installed and give detailed instructions on how to uninstall it.
Indubitably
Only a shiba inu could look so happy about being stuck between a chainlink fence and shed
Since all the rest have been mentioned I'll throw my hat in the ring for That's Where You're Wrong. It's the perfect happy ending for Suck It and See. It sounds like it should be playing at the end of a cheesy movie where the protagonists are driving down a dirt road into the sunset.
L
I think of “tacky” like I do “frumpy”, though tacky is about class and frumpy is about gender/sexuality. They’re both insults that can be arbitrarily decided applicable by the person deriding someone else. Costume jewelry is “tacky”...except when it’s mixed with unexpected pieces in a Vogue fashion spread. Tacky, frumpy, trendy, classic, etc are all constantly evolving concepts and are subject to individual bias. It’s kind of the adult version of middle school mean girls, really, and these words are used to encourage feelings of insecurity to spur consumerism.
You're getting downvoted but it's true. If you can't trust someone not to immediately switch from heals to DPS when the game starts, you weren't gonna win with an idiot like that anyway. All you're doing is making it harder to hero swap to counter enemy comps, which is the core premise of the game.
I mostly use Lightroom and Photoshop for now, but I may check out Resolve as a Premiere alternative since I can't get that one for free under a student program.
Yup
Apart from...don't rush /speedrun/?
Yes, and you will be getting shingles. You'll really enjoy that. But you did luck out and have parents who vaccinated you against whooping cough, measles and polio. I just hope you don't need a tetanus booster and reuse that. Because lockjaw is really no fun.
If you are visiting /r/tattoos for the first time, or visiting from /r/all, please be aware of ALL of the rules in the sidebar and stickied threads before posting. Common issues that WILL get you banned are any comments on personal appearance, any discussion about pricing, aftercare/medical advice or questions, and trolling.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/tattoos) if you have any questions or concerns.*
ITS BACK
When I started programming in highschool I knew nothing. After working through Deitel how to program java, I was able to pick up freelance work and land internships.   I agree that there’s no clear 0 - 100% tutorial or guide for what to do to learn development, but that’s why I started my blog.
Run 455
Hvor mye utbytting av andre land står Norge bak? Og antyder du liksom at kommunisme ikke blander seg i andre lands affærer? Hehe, tror du burde lese litt mer historie.
what region of the country are you in?  if it's the midwest i can help for sure, but otherwise you might need the help of a more serious hobbyist like /u/pablopubes
Technically there aren't any dragons in the official 5e books that know True Polymorph - but some Adult/Ancient dragons can use the Change Shape ability which is similar, but has the dragon to keep their stats instead of adopting the stats of the creature they're changing into.  That being said, it's not uncommon for people to give dragons spells either, you could probably find some information about how to do that if you wished, or start a thread to get more specific help balancing it.
He can't legally rent an apartment or take out a car loan. He can't have a bank account without an adult cosigner.   My kid is the same age, I can confirm that 17 year old boys are spectacularly bad at decision making. 
No, Skyrim uses The Creation Engine.
Time out...these people who just dumped their kids on you without asking...how on earth did that conversation go? “Surprise! Two little blessings for you! Be back at 10!”  Just inconsiderate....
favourite pasta
SAYORI DIDN'T DESERVE THIS
I literally dream of becoming this good at shooters, friends can say what they want about how good I am at shooters but seeing this shit makes me feel like trash.
I already see the signs of it.  We are in danger of this. Very much so.
First again Gg
Yeah, I'm fine. I just can't seem to get the writer part of me to take a nap every once in awhile. It's non stop, I talk like a novel. It gets annoying sometimes. 
You sound like an awesome person! 
Lets go GALAXY!! Easy 3 points vs the vibrations.
Oh god, but then you'd have the same quality house, car, living conditions as everyone else and wouldn't be able to have status symbols marking your worth as more than a poor or undereducated citizen. What kind of monster would want that kind of society?!
Tried to update script?
Will do bro I’m already skiiiing
Yep. I'm a small girl and always early to get a proper spot as well. Right before a concert starts, there are always those couple assholes (often holding hands so one can push and the other can follow) who barge their way through. "Sorry, excuse me, sorry". Doesn't even matter whether you yourself move or not, they'll just push through. It's very frustrating. 
This post has been removed because it's a repost, and because the title does not say enough about its subject. This forces people to click and read before they can decide whether they are interested. It also makes searching impossible.  If everyone did this, the subreddit would become unusable.  So please don't do it. Take the time to describe your link, and save the time of hundreds of other people.  When making a title, it's best to assume the reader doesn't know what you're talking about - but don't go overboard with every detail. Then check if there are any words you can cut out without losing any important information. 
hey you’re awesome thanks for responding so fast, totally slipped my mind. cheers
Forget those guys, I liked your meme. 
She's so precious!
I do about 8 grams of Kerry gold butter &amp; 1 tablespoon of HWC in a 12 oz cup of coffee. I look forward to it every morning! I don't blend, just stir. When I first tried it, I did a mix of coconut oil and butter. The oily feeling on my lips took some getting used to.... For a while I was doing just coconut oil with HWC, now just butter. I go through phases. It's rich and yummy 
i'm okay, pushin through. Anything happening today for you?
Isn’t it?!? Was so happy to get it. 
I can’t watch the end. I have 2 shepherds and my heart hurts. How do dogs get these things? And why did he say German shepherds are useless? 
Wait why couldn't you just watch the let's play, disconnect your keyboard and pretend to be Captain Sparkles while hitting it?
Yourboyrutter at it again 
why is porn and hentai a bad thing?
Thanks, i was blind af.
Getting my ass ready for that beast!
Thank you! He’s happy with the deal
She’s not comfortable with that. I asked her about that once before, about how we never had a chance to just be friends and work on our friendship. But she just wasn’t willing to ditch the labels, even for a little while.
So many memories love that game
Of all the races they had to choose this race for this video.  The Clusterfuck 500. Only Spingate tops this as worst race finish in the 2010s.
X3AP is an expansion pack to X3: Terran Conflict, so that's the base game you need.
On the ground? That's clearly a reference to Rapture.
Career-wise, in 1999 I was responsible for upgrading an NT network to a Windows 2000 AD domain at an ISP with 30k users and about 1500 websites. It took me six months to get things ready and a hellishly stressed four day weekend to switch over - I didn't lose anything or anybody. I was quite proud at the time, even integrated four Sun boxen for handling DNS into the Windows domain. Good times ;)
Haha it's in a museum I'm pretty sure the packaging is actually empty.
Subterfuge and sedition all in one network! Not Backing Country. NBC
I really wish I could find something like this for the Xfinity and truck series. It's difficult to find pics of those schemes sometimes, especially for the smaller teams.  I still haven't seen what some of the Chicagoland Xfinity schemes looked like. Anyone got a pic of the #89 or #90?
So far so good, i have a window beside the monitor and the matte screen does a good job against glare and I have not have a problem with it. 
They have a flagella, if not for a ciliack of trying!
https://i.redd.it/qec437v7uyk01.png
This is where bans come from
Fentanyl was bad enough- but fuck all these people making any of them- but especially carfent or anything worse- theirs nothing good coming out of them producing any of it- theres no recreational value- its good st killing people- nothing else- and dead customers cant come back or tell their friends about how strong your shit is(assuming that was what their goal was)   It makes no sense to me at all- NONE
He died... RIP to a legend
I enjoy being proven wrong. It doesn't happen often, and when it does, I feel a deep sense of satisfaction. I don't really enjoy winning arguments because it isn't a challenge. If I really want to win an argument I do. I will even argue a point I don't believe just to piss someone off from time to time.  I tend to dumb down my side of the argument so that other people can grasp it and express their thoughts. Often times even though a person has a hard time expressing themself (or is just stupid) their thoughts have a nugget of truth that inspires a more complex thought in me.
But what with Fujairah?
The only jerk part about you is the thing you with your right hand
He said he did on stream a month ago
Sounds like the same tour I saw them with Oceans of Slumber, but no Frost Giant. We had Solenmara and Maedusa with them. Awesome night!
How much in keys or paypal for jc3 xl?
They'll be able to bring him to the show for his birthday in due time!
They could do legacy again especially with T H I C C boi
Is there something more that needs to be done other than addressing the mishap, apologizing, and offering to reimburse people out of pocket?  Would you like him flogged in the street while people yell shame at him?  Public Execution?  I mean, what the fuck more do you want?
Way? The French army the most disorganized? They’re like one of the few European countries that has deployed their army recently. They were in Mali and I believe a few other countries.  They’re actually pretty solid. If anything England’s military is probably way worse than in WW2. They had a giant empire back then. Now it’s just them.
I'm guessing there's some sort of loophole around it because Wrath of Cortex was able to give both characters separate icons (and it wasn't level specific either, you hack the game to play as either in the other's levels and the HUD and all the lives and crates change accordingly). Hell the 16 bit Sonic games are able to do the same thing.  It's just a minor nitpick I admit, and if there is some sort of complication with N Sane's programming that makes it not worth the hassle then fine.
He did a great job of that, I'd love to see that more often.  It seemed like he was constantly in the way though. Maybe someone who understands referee positioning could tell us whether this was poor positioning or just bad luck.
Sorry /u/Dippahns, your submission has been removed from /r/softwaregore for the following reason:   * **Rule 1:** Posts must contain software gore, issues not directly caused by gore belong elsewhere. --- *If you feel this was done in error, or would like further clarification, please don't hesitate to [message the mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fsoftwaregore&amp;subject=Request to Review My Submission&amp;message=My submission was removed by a moderator. I would like some clarification.%0A%0AHere's the relevant information for my post:%0A%0ATitle: I try and like a picture and this happens... thanks instagram%0A%0APermalink: https://www.reddit.com/r/softwaregore/comments/8v357s/-/)*
So, because he anticipated low Battlefront content to review in the future, he preemptively reviewed the content of other franchises as tacit commentary about the need to branch out? 
I'd get my money back and get a proper mother instead.
